Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on Hbrary shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http : //books . google . com/| 




HARVARD 
COLLEGE 
LIBRARY 




li 



I 



V, 





1^2.1 



^ 



*^ 



t.^ <r 



^^*' c*-»- ""/;-» /L' A 



/ 



Th« »M 
Star 



jTy '^-, ^-, ^ , 



\ 



RELATIVITY 

THE SPECIAL AND GENEEAL 



:i:>i 



r 



lA: ^~ 



RELATIVITY 

THE SPECIAL AND GENERAL THEORY 



ALBERT EINSTEIN, Hi.D. 

TBAiraiiATKD BT 

BOBEBT W. LAWSON, M.Sc 



NEW YORK 

HENRY HOLT AND CWMPANY 

1921 



Wlb-LC 

X 



CoPTBiaH*, IMO 

BT 

HENBY HOLT AND COMPANY 



HAArvA^O 



UaftAAV 

FE8 131979 



7^/4. ( 



/M 



PREFACE 

THE present book is intendedi as far as pos- 
fflble, to give an exact insight into the 
theory of Relativity to those readers who, 
from a general scientific and philosophical point 
of view, are interested in the dieory, but who are 
not conversant with the mathematical apparatus ^ 
of theoretical physics. The work presumes a 
standard of education corresponding to that of a 
university matriculation examination, and, de- 
spite the shortness of the book, a fair amoimt 
of patience and force of will on the part of the 
reader. The author has ^)ared himself no pains 
in his endeavour to present the main ideas in the 
simplest and most intelligible form, and on the 

> The mathematical fundaments of the special theory of rela- 
tivity are to be found in the original papers of H. A. Lorentz, A. 
Einstein, H. Minkowski' published under the title Das ROatmUUs- 
primip (The Principle of Relativity) in B. G* Teubner's collection 
of monographs Portsckritte der maikemaHscken Wissenscktftm (Ad- 
vances in the Mathematical Sciences), also in M. Laue's eathaustive 
book Hu RdaimUUsprUmp — published by Friedr. ^^eweg & Son, 
Braunschweig. The general theory of relativity, together with the 
necessary parts of the theory of invariants, is dealt with in the 
author's book Die Grundlagm der aUgemekien Rdativitmstkeorie 
(The Foundations of the General Theory of Relativity) — Joh. 
Ambr. Barth, 1916; this book aswimes some familiarity with the 
special theoiy of relativity. 



vi RELATIVITY 

whole, in the sequence and connection in which 
they actually originated In the interest of 
deamessy it appeared to me iaevitable that I 
should repeat myself frequently, without paying 
the slightest attention to the elegance of the 
presentation. I adhered scrupulously to the 
precept of that brilliant theoretical phj^idst, 
L. Boltzmann, according to whom matters of 
elegance ought to be left to the tailor and to the 
cobbler. I make no pretence of having with- 
held from the reader difficulties which are in- 
herent to the subject. On the other hand, I have 
piuposely treated the empirical physical foimda- 
tions of the theory in a "step-motherly" fashion, 
so that readers unfamiliar with physics may not 
feel like the wanderer who was unable to see the 
forest for trees. May the book bring some one 
a few happy hours of suggestive thought! 

A. EINSTEIN 
December, 19x6 

NOTE TO THE THIRD EDITION 

IN the present year (1918) an excellent and 
detailed manual on the general theory of 
relativity, written by H. Weyl, was pub- 
lished by the firm Julius Springer (Berlin). This 
book, entitled Raum — Zeit — Materie (Space — 
Time — Matter), may be warmly recommended 
to mathematicians and physicists. 



BIOGRAPHICAL NOTE 

ALBERT EINSTEIN is the son of German- 
Jewish parents. He was bom in 1879 ^ 
the town of Uhn, Wiirtemberg, Germany. 
His schoolda3rs were spent in Mimich, where he 
attended the Gymnasium until his sixteenth year. 
After leaving school at Munich, he accompanied his 
parents to Milan, whence he proceeded to Switzer- 
land six months later to continue his studies. 

From 1896 to 1900 Albert Einstein studied 
mathematics and physics at the Technical High 
School in Zurich, as he intended becoming a 
secondary school {Gymnasium) teacher. For 
some time afterwards he was a private tutor, 
and having meanwhile become naturalised, he 
obtained a post as engineer m the Swiss Patent 
Office in 1902, which position he occupied till 1909. 
The main ideas involved in the most important 
of Einstein's theories date back to this period. 
Amongst these may be mentioned: The Special 
Theory of Relativity , Inertia of Energy ^ Theory of 
the Brownian Movement, and the QuantunhLaw 
of the Emission and Absorption of Light (1905). 
These were followed some years later by die 



viu RELATIVITY 

Theory of the Specific Heat ofSoUd Bodies^ and the 
fundamental idea of the General Theory ofRdaiivUy. 
During the interval 1909 to 191 1 he occupied 
the post of Professor Eoctraordinarius at the 
University of Zurich, afterwards being appointed 
to the University of Prague, Bohemia, where he 
remained as Professor Ordinarius imtil 1912. 
In the latter year Professor Einstein accepted a 
similar chair at the Pclytechnikuntj Zurich, and 
continued his activities there xmtil 1914, when 
he received a call to the Prussian Academy of 
Science, Berlin, as successor to Van^t Hoff. 
Professor Einstein is able to devote himself 
freely to his studies at the Berlin Academy, and 
it was here that he succeeded in completing his 
work on the General Theory of RdativUy (1915- 
17). Professor Einstein also lectures on various 
special braaches of ph}rsics at the University of 
Berlin, and, in addition, he is Director of the 
Institnte for Physical Research of the Kaiser 
Wilhdm Gesdlschaft. 

> Professor Einstein has been twice married. 
His first wife, whom he married at Berne in 1903, 
was a fellow-student from Serbia. There were 
two sons of this marriage, both of whom are liv- 
ing in Zurich, the elder being sixteen years of age. 
Recently Professor Einstein married a widowed 
cousin, with whom he is now living in Berlin. 

R. W. L. 



TRANSLATOR'S NOTE 

IN presenting this translation to the English- 
reading public, it is hardly necessary for me 
to enlarge on the Author's prefatory remarks, 
except to draw attention to those additions to the 
book which do not appear in the original. 

At my request, Professor Einstein kindly sup- 
plied me with a portrait of himself, by one of 
Germany's most celebrated artists. Appendix in, 
on ''The Eiqperimehtal Confirmation of the Gen- 
eral Theory of Relativity," has been written 
specially for this translation. Apart from these 
valuable additions to the book, I have included 
a biographical note on the Author, and, at the 
end of the book, an Index and a list of English 
references to the subject. This list, which is 
more suggestive than exhaustive, is intended as 
a guide to those readers who wish to pursue the 
subject farther. 

I desire to tender my best thanks to my col- 
leagues Professor S. R.'Mihier, D.Sc.« and Mr. 
W. E. Curtis, A.R.C.SC., F.R.A.S., also to my 
friend Dr. Arthur Holmes, A.R.C.SC| F.CS., 



X RELATIVITY 

of the Imperial College, for their kindness in 
reading through the manuscript, for helpful 
criticism, and for niunerous suggestions. I owe 
an expression of thanks also to Messrs. Methuen 
for their ready coimsel and advice, and for the 
care they have bestowed on the work during the 
course of its publication. 

ROBERT W. LAWSON 

The Physics Laboratory 

The University of Sheffield 
June 12, 1920 



CONTENTS 

PART I 

THE SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVrrY|, 

PAGE 
I. Physical Meaning of Geometrical Propo- 
sitions I 

n. The System of Co-ordinates 5 

m. Space and Time in Classical Mechanics . 9 

IV. The GalHeian System of Co-ordinates . . 12 

V. The Principle of Relativity (in the Re- 
stricted Sense) 14 

VI. The Theorem of the Addition of Velocities 

employed in Classical Mechanics « . . 19 

Vn. The Apparent Incompatibility of the Law 
of Propagation of Light with the Prin- 
ciple of Relativity 21 

Vm. On the Idea of Time in Phjrsics .... 25 

IX. The Relativity of Simultaneity 30 

X. On the Relativity of the Conception of 

Distance 34 

XI. The Lorentz Transformation 36 

Xn. The Behaviour of Measuring-Rods and 

Clocks in Motion « • 42 



zH BEIATIVITY 

PAGB 

XTTT, Theorem of the Addition of Velodties. 

The Experiment of Fizeau 4s 

XIV. The Heuristic Value of the Theory of 

Relativity 50 

XV. General Results of the Theory 52 

XVI. Experience and the Special Theory of 

Relativ ty 58 

XVn. Minkowski's Four-dimensional Space . . 65 

PART n 

THE GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

XVm. Spedal and General Principle of Relativity 69 

XIX. The Gravitational Field 74 

XX. The Equality of Inertial and Gravitational 
Mass as an Argument for the General 
Postulate of Relativity 78 

XXI. In what Respects are the Foundations of 
Classical Mechanics and of the Spedal 
Theory of Relativity unsatisfactory? . 84 

XXn. A Few Inferences from the General Prin- 
ciple of Relativity 87 

XXm. Behaviour of Qocks and Measuring-Rods 

on a Rotating Body of Reference ... 93 

XXIV. Euclidean and Non-Eudidean Continuum 98 

XXV. Gaussian Co-ordinates 103 

XXVI. The Space-time Continuum of the Spedal 
Theory of Relativity considered as a 
Euclidean Continuum xo8 



CONTENTS ziii 

PAGB 

XXVn. The Space-time Continuum of the General 
Theory of Relativity is not a Euclidean 
G>ntinuum ixz 

XXVm. Exact Formulation of the General Prin- 
ciple of Relativity 1x5 

XXDC The Solution of the Problem of Gravi- 
tation on the Basis of the General 
Principle of Relativity 119 

PART m 

CONSIDERATIONS ON THE UNIVERSE 

AS A WHOLE 

XXX. Cosmological Difficulties of Newton's 

Theory 125 

XXXL The Possibility of a "Finite" and yet 

"Unbounded" Universe 128 

XXXn. The Structure of Space according to the 

General Theory of Relativity .... 135 

APPENDICES 

L Simple Derivation of the Lorentz Transfor- 
mation 139 

IL Minkowski's Four-dimensional Space ("World") 

[Supplementary to Section XVn.] .... 146 

in. The E:cperimental Confirmation of the General 

Theory of Relativity 148 

(a) Motion of the Poihelion of Mercury . . 150 

(b) Deflection of light by a Gravitational 

Field 152 

(c) Displacement of Spectral lines towards 

the Red 155 

BiBUOGRAFHy z6x 

Index 165 



f 



RELATIVITY 

PART I 
THE SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 



PHySICAL MEANING OF GEOMETRICAL 

PROPOSITIONS 

IN your schooldays most of you who read this 
book made acquaintance with the noble build- 
ing of Euclid's geometry, and you remember 
— perhaps with more respect than love — the 
magnificent structure, on the lofty staircase of 
which you were chased about for imcounted 
hours by conscientious teachers. By reason of 
your past experience, you would certainly regard 
every one with disdain who should pronoxmce 
even the most out-of-the-way proposition of this 
science to be untrue. But perhaps this feeling of 
proud certainty would leave you immediately if 
some one were to ask you: " What, then, do you 
mean by the assertion that these propositions are 
true?'' Let us proceed to give this question a 
little consideration. 
Geometry sets out from certain conceptions such 

as " plane," " point," and " straight line," with 

1 



C SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

which we aie able to associate more or less defi- 
nite ideas, and from certain simple propositions 
(axioms) which, in virtue of these ideas, we are 
inclined to accept as ^^ true." Then, on the basis 
of a logical process, the justification of which we 
feel ourselves compelled to admit, all remaining 
propositions are shown to follow from those axioms, 
i.e. they are proven. A proposition is then correct 
(" true ") when it has been derived in the recog- 
nised manner from the axioms. The question of 
the " truth " of the individual geometrical propo- 
sitions is thus reduced to one of the ^' truth " of 
the axioms. Now it has long been known that 
the last question is not only unanswerable by the 
methods of geometry, but that it is in itself en- 
tirely without meaning. We cannot ask whether 
it is true that only one straight line goes through 
two points. We can only say that Euclidean ge- 
ometry deals with things called " straight lines," 
to each of which is ascribed the property of being 
uniquely determined by two points situated on it. 
The concept "true" does not tally with the 
assertions of pure geometry, because by the word 
" true " we are eventually in the habit of desig- 
nating always the correspondence with a " real " 
object; geometry, however, is not concerned with 
the relation of the ideas involved in it to objects 
of experience, but only with the logical connection 
of these ideas among themsdves. 



GEOMETRICAL FB0F06ITI0NS S 

It is not difficult to understand why, in spite of 
this, we fed constrained to call the propositions of 
geometry ^'true.'^ CSeometrical ideas correspond 
to more or less exact objects in nature, and these 
last are undoubtedly the exclusive cause of the 
genesis of those ideas. Geometry oiight to refrain 
from such a course, in order to give to its structure 
the largest possible logical unity. The practice, 
for example, of seeing in a "distance'' two marked 
positions on a practically rigid body is something 
which is lodged deq)ly in our habit of thought. 
We are accustomed further to regard three points 
as being situated on a straight line, if their ap- 
parent positions can be made to coincide for ob« 
servation with one eye, under suitable choice of 
our place of observation. 

If, in pursuance of our habit of thought, we now 
supplement the propositions of Euclidean geometry 
by the single proposition that two points on a 
practically rigid body always correspond to the 
same distance (line-interval), independentiy of 
any changes in position to which we may subject 
the body, the propositions of Euclidean geometry 
then resolve themselves into propositions on the 
possible relative position of practically rigid bodies.^ 

^ It f oUowi that a natural object is associated also with a stiaiji^t 
line. Three pcHnts A, B and C on a rigid body thus lie in a stxai^t 
line when, the points A and C being given, B is chosen such that the 
sum of the distances AB and BC is as short as possible. This in- 
complete suggestion will suffice for our present puipose. 



4 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

Geometiy which has been supplemented in 
this way is then to be treated as a branch of 
physics. We can now Intimately ask as to the 
'^ truth" of geometrical propositions interpreted 
in this way, since we are justified in asking whether 
these propositions are satisfied for those real things 
we have associated with the geometrical ideas. In 
less exact terms we can express this by saying 
that by the "truth" of a geometrical proposition 
in this sense we imderstand its validity for a con- 
struction with ruler and compasses. 

Of course the conviction of the "truth" of geo- 
metrical propositions in this sense is foimded 
exclusively on rather incomplete experience. For 
the present we shall assume the "truth" of the 
geometrical propositions, then at a later stage 
(in the general theory of relativity) we shall see 
that this "truth" is limitedi and we shall consider 
the extent of its limitation. 



n 

THE SYSTEM OF CO-ORDINATES 

GN the basis of the physical interpretation of 
distance which has been indicated, we are 
also in a position to estabUsh the distance 
between two points on a rigid body by means of 
measurements. For this purpose we require a 
"distance" (rod S) which is to be used once and 
for all, and which we employ as a standard measure. 
If, now, A and B are two points on a rigid body, 
we can construct the line joining them according 
to the rules of geometry; then, starting from A^ 
we can mark off the distance 5 time after time 
imtil we reach B. The nmnber of these operations, 
required is the numerical measure of the distance 
AB. This is the basis of all measurement of 
length.^ 

Every description of the scene of an event or of 
the position of an object in space is based on the 
specification of the point on a rigid body (body of 
reference) with which that event or object coin- 

^ Here we have aasmned that there is nothing left over, i,e, that 
the measurement gives a whole number. This difficulty is got over 
by the use of divided measiuing-rods, the introduction of which 
does not demand any fundamentally new method. 

6 






6 SPECIAL THEORY OF BEIATIVrrY 

• 

ddes. Tliis applies not only to scientific descrq>- 
tion, but also to everyday life. If I analyse the 
place specification '^Trafalgar Square, London/' ^ 
I arrive at the following result. The earth is the 
rigid body to which the specification of place 
refers; ^^ Trafalgar Square, London" is a well- 
defined point, to which a name has been assigned, 
and with which the event coincides in space.' 

This primitive method of place specification 
deals only with places on the surface of rigid bodies, 
and is dependent on the existence of points on 
this surface which are distinguishable from each 
other. But we can free ourselves from both of 
these limitations without altering the nature of 
our specification of position. If, for instance, a 
doud is hovering over Trafalgar Square, then we 
can determine its position relative to the surface 
of the earth by erecting a pole perpendicularly on 
the Square, so that it reaches the doud. The 
length of the pole measured with the standard 
measuring-rod, combined with the specification of 
the position of the foot of the pole, supplies us 
with a complete place specification. On the basis 

"^ ^ I have chosen this as bdng more familiar to the English reader 
than the "Potsdamer Platz, Berlin/' which is referred to in the 
original. (R. W. L.) 

* It is not necessary here to investigate further the significance 
of the expression "coincidence in space." This conception is suf- 
ficiently obvious to ensure that differences of opinion are scarcely 
likely to arise as to its applicability in practice. 



THE SYSTEM OF C(M)BDINATHB 7 

of this illustration, we are able to see the maimer 
in which a refinement of the conception of position 
has been developed. 

(a) We imagine the rigid body, to which the 
place specification is referred, supplemented in 
such a manner that the object whose position we 
require is reached by the completed rigid body. 

(p) In locating the position of the object, we 
make use of a nxmiber (here the length of the pole 
measured with the measuring-rod) instead of 
designated points of reference. 

(c) We speak of the height of the doud even 
when the pole which reaches the cloud has not 
been erected. By means of optical observations 
of the cloud from different positions on the 
ground, and taking into account the properties of 
the propagation of light, we determine the length 
of the pole we should have required in order to 
reach the cloud. 

From this consideration we see that it will be 
advantageous if, in the description of position, it 
should be possible by means of numerical measures 
to make ourselves independent of the existence of 
marked positions (possessing names) on the rigid 
body of reference. In the physics of measurement 
this is attained by the appUcation of the Cartesian 
system of co-ordinates. 

This consists of three plane surfaces perpendicu- 
lar to each othet and rigidly attached to a rigid 



8 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

body. Referred to a system of co-ordinates, the 
scene of any event will be determined (for the 
main part) by the specification of the lengths of 
the three perpendiculars or co-ordinates (x, y, z) 
which can be dropped from the scene of the event 
to those three plane surfaces. The lengths of 
these three perpendiculars can be determined by 
a series of manipulations with rigid measuring- 
rods performed according to the rules and methods 
laid down by Eudidean geometry. 

In practice, the rigid surfaces which constitute 
the system of co-ordinates are generally not 
available; furthermore, the magnitudes of the co- 
ordinates are not actually determined by con- 
structions with rigid rods, but by indirect means. 
If the results of physics and astronomy are to 
maintain their clearness, the physical meaning of 
specifications of position must always be sought 
in accordance with the above considerations.^ 

We thus obtain the following result: Every 
description of events in space involves the use of 
a rigid body to which such events have to be 
referred. The resulting relationship takes for 
granted that the laws of Euclidean geometry hold 
for "distances,*' the "distance" being represented 
physically by means of the convention of two 
marks on a rigid body. 

^ A refinement and modification of diese views does not becomt 
necessary until we come to deal with the general theofy of relatlvi^, 
treated in the second part of this book. 



m 

SPACE AND TIME IN CLASSICAL MECHANICS 

"'TT^HE purpose of mechanics is to describe how 
I bodies change their position in space with 
time." I should load my conscience with 
grave sins against the sacred spirit of lucidity 
were I to formulate the aims of mechanics in this 
way, without serious reflection and detailed ex- 
planations. Let us proceed to disclose these sins. 
It is not dear what is to be understood here by 
^'position" and "space." I stand at the window 
of a railway carriage which is travelling unif ormly, 
and drop a stone on the embankment, without 
throwing it. Then, disregarding the influence of 
the air resistance, I see the stone descend in a 
straight line. A pedestrian who observes the mis- 
deed from the footpath notices that the stone 
faUs to earth in a parabolic curve. I now ask: 
Do the "positions" traversed by the stone lie "in 
reality" on a straight line or on a parabola? 
Moreover, what is meant here by motion "in 
space" ? From the considerations of the previous 
section the answer is self-evident. In the first 
place, we entirely shun the vague word "space," 



10 SPECIAL THEORY OP REIATIVITT 

of whichy we must honestly acknowledge, we can- 
not form the slightest conception, and we replace 
it by ^'motion relative to a practically rigid body 
of reference." The positions relative to the body 
of reference (railway carriage or embankment) 
have already been defined in detail in the preced- 
ing section. If instead of "body of reference'* 
we insert "system of co-ordinates," which is a 
useful idea for mathematical description, we are 
in a position to say : The stone traverses a straight 
line relative to a S3rstem of co-ordinates rigidly 
attached to the carriage, but relative to a system 
of co-ordinates rigidly attached to the groimd 
(embankment) it describes a parabola. With the 
aid of this example it is clearly seen that there is 
no such thing as an independently existing tra- 
jectory (lit. "path-curve" ^), but only a trajectory 
relative to a particular body of reference. 

In order to have a complete description of the 
motion, we must specify how the body alters its 
position with time; i.e. for every point on the 
trajectory it must be stated at what time the 
body is situated there. These data must be 
supplemented by such a definition of time that, 
in virtue of this definition, these time-values can 
be r^arded essentially as magnitudes (results of 
measurements) capable of observation. If we 
take our stand on the ground of classical me- 

^ lliat It, a carve along which the body movie. 



SPACE AND TDCE 11 

dianics, we can satisfy this requirement for our 
illustiation in the following manner. We imagine 
two clocks of identical construction; the man at 
the railway-carriage window is holding one of 
them, and the man on the footpath the other. 
Each of the observers determines the position on 
his own reference-body occupied by the stone at 
each tick of the clock he is holding in his hand. 
In this connection we have not taken account of 
the inaccuracy involved by the finiteness of the 
velocity of propagation of light. With this and 
with a second difficulty prevailing here we shall 
have to deal in detail later. 



IV 

THE GALILEIAN SYSTEM OF 
CXMJRDINATES 

AS is well known, the fundamental law of the 
mechanics of Galilei-Newton, which is 
known as the law of inertia, can be stated 
thus: A body removed sufficiently far from other 
bodies continues in a state of rest or of uniform 
motion in a straight line. This law not only sa3rs 
something about the motion of the bodies, but it 
also indicates the reference-bodies or s)rstems of 
co-ordinates, permissible in mechanics, which can 
be used in mechanical description. The visiUe 
fixed stars are bodies for which the law of inertia 
certainly holds to a high degree of approximation. 
Now if we use a system, of co-ordinates which is 
rigidly attached to the earth, then, relative to 
this system, every fixed star describes a drde of 
immense radius in the course of an astronomical 
day, a result which is opposed to the statement of 
the law of inertia. So that if we adhere to this law 
we must refer these motions only to systems of co- 
ordinates relative to which the fixed stars do not 
move in a circle. A system of co-ordinates of 

18 



THE GALILEIAN SYSTEM 13 

which the state of motion is such that the law of 
inertia holds relative to it is called a ^'Galileian 
system of co-ordinates." The laws of the me- 
chanics of Galilei-Newton can be regarded as valid 
only for a Galileian system of co-ordinates. 



r 



THE PRINCIPLE OF RELATIVITY (IN THE 

RESTRICTED SENSE) 

IN order to attain the greatest possible dear- 
nessy let us return to our example of the raQ- 
way carriage supposed to be travelling 
uniformly. We call its motion a uniform transla- 
tion ("uniform" because it is of constant velocity 
and direction, "translation" because although 
the carriage changes its position relative to the 
embankment yet it does not rotate in so doing). 
Let us imagine a raven flying through the air in 
such a manner that its motion, as observed from 
the embankment, is uniform and in a straight line. 
K we were to observe the fl5ang raven from the 
moving railway carriage, we should find that the 
motion of the raven would be one of different veloc- 
ity and direction, but that it would still be uni- 
form and in a straight line. Expressed in an 
abstract manner we may say: If a mass m is 
moving uniformly in a straight line with respect 
to a co-ordinate system Kj then it will also be 
moving imif ormly and in a straight line relative 
to a second co-ordinate system K\ provided that 



THE FBINCIFLE OF BELATIVITY U 

the latter is executing a unifonn translatoiy 
motion with respect to £• In accordance with the 
discussion contained in the preceding section, it 
follows that: 

If iST is a Galileian co-ordinate system, then 
every other co-ordinate system K^ is a, Galileian 
one, when, in relation to J^, it is in a condition of 
uniform motion of translation. Relative to K' 
the mechanical laws of Galilei-Newton hold good 
exactly as they do with respect to K. 

We advance a step farther in our generalisation 
when we express the tenet thus: If, relative to 
Kf K! is a m^ormly moving co-ordinate system 
devoid of rotation, then natural phenomena run 
their coturse with req)ect to K! according to 
exactly the same general laws as with respect to 
K. This statement is called the principle oj 
relativity (in the restricted sense). 

As long as one was convinced that all natural 
phenomena were^ capable of representation with 
the help of classical mechanics, there was no need 
to doubt the validity of this principle of relativity. 
But in view of the more recent development of 
electrodynamics and optics it became more and 
more evident that classical mechanics affords an 
insufficient foundation for the physical description 
of all natural phenomena. At this jimcture the 
question of the validity of the principle of relativity 
became ripe for discussion, and it did not appear 



16 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

impossible that the answer to this question might 
be in the negative. 

Nevertheless, there are two general facts which 
at the outset speak very much in favour of the 
validity of the principle of relativity. Even 
though classical mechanics does not supply us 
with a sufficiently broad basis for the theoretical 
presentation of all physical phenomena, still we 
must grant it a considerable measure of "truth/' 
since it supplies us with the actual motions of the 
heavenly bodies with a delicacy of detail little 
short of wonderful. The principle of relativity 
must therefore apply with great accuracy in the 
domain of mechanics. But that a principle of 
such broad generality should hold with such 
exactness in one domain of phenomena, and yet 
should be invalid for another, is a priori not very 
probable. 

We now proceed to the second argument, to 
which, moreover, we shall return later. If the 
principle of relativity (in the restricted sense) 
does not hold, then the Galileian co-ordinate 
systems Ky K\ K!\ etc., which are moving imi- 
f ormly relative to each other, will not be equivalent 
for the description of natural phenomena. In 
this case we should be constrained to believe that 
natural laws are capable of being formulated in a 
particularly simple manner, and of cotuse only on 
condition that, from amongst all possible Galileian 



THE FBINCIFLE OP RELATIVITY 17 

co-ordinate systems, we should have chosen one 
(Ko) of a particular state of motion as our body of 
reference. We should then be justified (because 
of its merits for the description of natural phe- 
nomena) in calling this system '^ absolutely at 
rest/' and all other Galileian sjrstems K ^'in mo- 
tion/' If, for instance, our embankment were the 
system JSTo, then our railway carriage would be a 
system K^ relative to which less simple laws would 
hold than with respect to Kq. This diminished 
simplicity would be due to the fact that the carriage 
K would be in motion (i.e. "really") with respect 
to Kq. In the general laws of nature which have 
been formulated with reference to K^ the magni- 
tude and direction of the velocity of the carriage 
would necessarily play a part. We should e3q)ect, 
for instance, that the note emitted by an organ- 
pipe placed with its axis parallel to the direction of 
travel would be different from that emitted if the 
axis of the pipe were placed perpendicular to this 
direction. Now in virtue of its motion in an orbit 
round the sun, our earth is comparable with a rail- 
way carriage travelling with a velocity of about 
30 kilometres per second. If the principle of 
relativity were not valid we should therefore expect 
that the direction of motion of the earth at any 
moment would enter into the laws of nature, and 
also that phjrsical sjrstems in their behaviour 
would be dependent on the orientation in space 



18 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

with respect to the eaxtk For owing to the altera- 
tion in direction of the velocity of revolution of the 
earth in the course of a year, the earth cannot be 
at rest relative to the hypothetical system Ko 
throughout the whole year. However, the most 
careful observations have never revealed such 
anisotropic properties in terrestrial physical space, 
i.e. a ph3^cal non-equivalence of different direc- 
tions. This is a very powerful argument in favour 
of the principle of relativity. 



VI 

THE THEOREM OF THE ADDITION OF 
VELOCITIES EMPLOYED IN CLASSI- 
CAL MECHANICS 

LET us s\q>pose our old friend the nulway 
carriage to be travelling along the rails with 
a constant velocity Vy and that a man 
traverses the length of the carriage in the direction 
of travel with a velocity w. How quickly, or, in 
other words, with what velocity W does the man 
advance relative to the embankment during the 
process? The only possible answer seems to 
result from the following consideration: If the 
man were to stand still for a second, he would 
advance relative to the embankment through a 
distance v equal numerically to the velocity of the 
carriage. As a consequence of his walking, how- 
ever, he traverses an additional distance w relative 
to the carriage, and hence also relative to the 
embankment, in this second, the distance w being 
numerically equal to the velocity with which he is 
walking. Thus in total he covers the distance 
W^v+w relative to the embankment in the 
second considered. We shall see later that this 
result, which expresses the theorem of the addi- 

19 



20 SPECIAL THEORY OF BEIATlVITy 

tion of velocities employed in classical mechanics, 
cannot be maintained; in other words, the law 
that we have just written down does not hold in 
reality. For the time being, however, we shall 
assume its correctness. 



/ 



vn 

THE APPARENT INCOMPATIBILITY OF THE 
LAW OF PROPAGATICW OF LIGHT WITH 
THE PRINCIPLE OF RELATIVITY 

THERE is hardly a simpler law in physics 
than that according to which light is propa- 
gated in empty space. Every child at school 
knows, or believes he knows, that this propagation 
takes place in straight lines with a velocity 
c =300,000 km. /sec. At all events we know with 
great exactness that this velocity is the same for 
all colours, because if this were not the case, the 
minimum of emission would not be observed 
simultaneously for different colours during the 
eclipse of a fixed star by its dark neighbour. By 
means of similar considerations based on observa- 
tions of double stars, the Dutch astronomer De 
Sitter was also able to show that the velocity of 
propagation of light cannot depend on the velocity 
of motion of the body emitting the light. The 
assmnption that this velocity of propagation is 
dependent on the direction "in space" is in itself 
improbable. 

In short, let us assume that the simple law of 
the constancy of the velocity of light c (in vacuum) 



» SPECIAL THEORY OF BELATIVITy 

is justifiably believed by the child at schooL Who 
would imagine that this simple law has plunged 
the conscientiously thoughtful physidst into the 
greatest intellectual difficulties? Let us consider 
how these difficulties arise. 

Of course we must refer the process of the 
propagation of light (and indeed every other 
process) to a rigid reference-body (co-ordinate 
system). As such a system let us again choose 
our embankment. We shall imagine the air above 
it to have been removed. K a ray of light be sent 
along the embankment, we see from the above 
that the tip of the ray will be transmitted with 
the velocity c relative to the embankment. Now 
let us suppose that our railway carriage is again 
travelling along the railway lines with the velocity 
Vj and that its direction is the same as that of the 
ray of light, but its velocity of coiurse much less. 
Let us inquire about the velocity of propagation 
of the ray of light relative to the carriage. It is 
obvious that we can here apply the consideration 
of the previous section, since the ray of light plays 
the part of the man walking along relatively to 
the carriage. The velocity W of the man relative 
to the embankment is here replaced by the velocity 
of light relative to the embankment w is the 
required velocity of light with respect to the 
carriage, and we have 




THE PROPAGATION OF UGHT SS 

The velocity of propagation of a ray of light 
relative to the carriage thus comes out smaller 
than c. 

But this result comes into conflict with the 
principle of relativity set forth in Section V. For, 
like every other general law of nature, the law of 
the transmission of light in vaaw) must, according 
to the principle of relativity, be the same for the 
railway carriage as reference-body as when the 
rails axe the body of reference. But, from our 
above consideration, this would appear to be im- 
possible. If every ray of light is propagated rela- 
tive to the embankment with the velocity c, then 
for this reason it would appear that another law 
of propagation of light must necessarily hold with 
respect to the carriage — a result contradictory to 
the principle of relativity. 

In view of this dilemma there appears to be 
nothing else for it than to abandon either the 
principle of relativity or the simple law of the 
propagation of light in vacuo. Those of you who 
have carefully followed the preceding discussion 
are almost sure to expect that we should retain 
the principle of relativity, which appeals so con- 
vincingly to the intellect because it is so natural 
and simple. The law of the propagation of light 
in vacuo would then have to be replaced by a 
more complicated law conformable to the principle 
of relativity. The development of theoretical 



«4 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

physics shows, however, that we cannot pursue 
this course. The epoch-making theoretical in- 
vestigations of H. A. Lorentz on the dectrody- 
namical and optical phenomena connected with 
moving bodies show that experience in this domain 
leads conclusively to a theory of electromagnetic 
phenomena, of which the law of the constancy of 
the velocity of light in vacuo is a necessary conse- 
quence. Prominent theoretical ph3rsicists were 
therefore more inclined to reject the principle of 
relativity, in spite of the fact that no empirical 
data had been f otmd which were contradictory to 
this principle. 

At this juncture the theory of relativity entered 
the arena. As a result of an analysis of the physical 
conceptions of time and space, it became evident 
that in reality there is not the least incompatibility 
between the principle of relativity and the law of 
propagation of lightj and that by systematically 
holding fast to both these laws a logically rigid 
theory could be arrived at. This theory has been 
called the special theory cf relativity to distinguish 
it from the extended theory, with which we shall 
deal later. In the following pages we shall present 
the fundamental ideas of ^e iqpedal theory of 
relativity. 



y 



ON THE IDEA OF TIME IN PHYSICS 

LIGHTNING has struck the rails on our rail- 
way embankment at two places A and B 
far distant from each other. I make the 
additional assertion that these two lightning 
flashes occurred simultaneously. If I ask you 
whether there is sense in this statement, you 
will answer my question with a decided "Yes." 
But if I now approach you with the request to 
explain to me the sense of the statement more 
precisely, you find after some consideration that 
the answer to this question is not so easy as it 
appears at first sight. 

After some time perhaps the following answer 
would occur to you: "The significance of the 
statement is dear in itseU and needs no further 
explanation; of course it would require some con- 
sideration if I were to be commissioned to deter- 
mine by observations whether in the actual case 
the two events took place simultaneously or not." 
I cannot be satisfied with this answer for the follow- 
ing reason. Supposing that as a result of ingenious 

considerations an able meteorologist were to dis- 

u 



f8 SPECIAL THEORY OF BELArTIVIT7 

cover that the lightning must always strike the 
places A and B simultaneously, then we should be 
faced with the task of testing whether or not this 
theoretical result is in accordance with the reality. 
We encounter the same difficulty with all physical 
statements in which the conception '^simultane- 
ous" plays a part. The concq>t does not exist 
for the physicist imtil he has the possibility of 
discovering whether or not it is fulfilled in an 
actual case. We thus require a definition of 
simultaneity such that this definition supplies us 
with the method by means of which, in the present 
case, he can decide by experiment whether or not 
both the lightning strokes occurred simidtane- 
ously. As long as this requirement is not satisfied, 
I allow m3^1f to be deceived as a physicist (and 
of course the same appHes if I am not a physicist), 
when I imagine that I am able to attach a meaning 
to the statement of simultaneity. (I would ask 
the reader not to proceed farther until he is fully 
convinced on this point.) 

After thinking the matter over for some time 
you then offer the following suggestion with which 
to test simidtandty. By measiuing along the 
rails, the connecting line AB shoidd be measured 
up and an observer placed at the mid-point M 
of the distance AB. This observer should be 
supplied with an arrangement (e.g. two mirrors 
inclined at 90^) which allows him visually to ob- 



IDEA OP TIME IN PHYSICS Vt 

serve both places A and B at the same time. If 
the observer perceives the two flashes of lightning 
at the same time, then they are simultaneous. 

I am very pleased with this suggestion, but for 
all that I cannot regard the matter as quite settled, 
because I feel constrained to raise the following 
objection: "Your definition would certainly be 
right, if I only knew that the light by means of 
which the observer at M perceives the lightning 

flashes travels along the length A > M with the 

same velocity as along the length B ► M. 

But an examination of this supposition would only 
be possible if we already had at our disposal the 
means of measuring time. It would thus appear 
as though we were moving here in a logical circle." 

After further consideration you cast a somewhat 
disdainful glance at me — and rightly so — and 
you declare: "I maintain my previous definition 
nevertheless, because in reality it assumes ab- 
solutely nothing about light. There is only one 
demand to be made of the definition of simulta- 
neity, namely, that in every real case it must 
supply us with an empirical decision as to whether 
or not the conception that has to be defined is 
fulfilled. That my definition satisfies this demand 
is indisputable. That light requires the same 

time to traverse the path A >M as for the 

path B > Jf is in reality neither a supposition 

nor a hypothesis about the physical nature of light, 



88 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

but a stipulation which I can make of my own 
freewill in order to arrive at a definition of 
simultaneity." 

It is dear that this definition can be used to 
give an exact meaning not only to two events, but 
to as many events as we care to choose, and in- 
dependently of the positions of the scenes of the 
events with respect to the body of reference* 
(here the railway embankment). We are thus led 
also to a definition of "time" in physics. For 
this purpose we suppose that clocks of identical 
construction are placed at the points Ay B and C 
of the railway line (co-ordinate system), and that 
they are set in such a manner that the positions 
of their pointers are simultaneously (in the above 
sense) the same. Under these conditions we 
understand by the "time" of an event the reading 
(position of the hands) of that one of these clocks 
which is in the immediate vicinity (in space) of 
the event. In this manner a time-value is asso- 
ciated with every event which is essentially capable 
of observation. 

This stipulation contains a further physical 

^ We suppose further that, when three events A, B and C take 
place in different places in such a manner that, if il is simultaneous 
with Bf and B is simultaneous with C (sunultaneous in the sense of 
the above definition), then the criterion for the simultaneity of the 
pair of events il, C is also satisfied. This assumption is a physical 
hypothesis about the law of propagation of light; it must certainly 
be fulfilled if we are to maintain the law of the constancy of the 
vdodty of light in vacuo. 



^ 



roEA OP TIME IN PHYSICS 89 

hypothesis, the validity of which will hardly be 
doubted without empirical evidence to the con- 
trary. It has been assumed that all these clocks 
go at the same rate if they are of identical construc- 
tion. Stated more exactly: When two dod:s 
arranged at rest in different places of a reference- 
body are set in such a manner that a particular 
position of the pointers of the one clock is simul- 
taneous (in the above sense) with the same position 
of the pointers of the other dock, then identical 
'^ settings" are always simultaneous (in the sense 
of the above definition). 



IX 
TEIE RELATIVITY OF SBfULTANEITy 

UP to now .our considerations have been re- 
ferred to a particular body of reference, 
which we have styled a "railway embank- 
ment." We suppose a very long train travelling 
along the rails with the constant velocity v and 
in the direction indicated in Fig. i. People 
travelling' in this train will with advantage use 
the train as a rigid reference-body (co-ordmate 
system); they regard all events in reference to 



fr ivi' ' ^ 

"^1 : i 



M« '— -♦' V ^, Tnin 



_ EmbaJikmeni 

Fig. I. 

the train. Then every event which takes place 
along the line also takes place at a particular 
point of the train. Also the definition of simul- 
taneity can be given relative to the train in exactly 
the same way as with respect to the embankment. 
As a nattu-al consequence, however, the following 
question arises: 

Are two events {e.g. the two strokes of lightning 
A and B) which are simultaneous with reference to 

80 



RELATIVITY OP SIMULTANEITY SI 

the railway embankment also simultaneous relatively 
to the train? We shall show directly that the 
answer must be in the negative. 

When we say that the lightning strokes A and B 
are simultaneous with respect to the embankment, 
we mean: the rays of light emitted at the places 
A and Bj where the lightning occurs, meet each 

other at the mid-point M of the length A > B 

of the embankment. But the events A and B 
also correspond to positions A and B on the 
train. Let M^ be the mid-point of the distance 

A > B on the travelling train. Just when the 

flashes ^ of lightning occur, this point Jf' naturally 
coincides with the point ilf , but it moves towards 
the right in the diagram with the velocity v of 
the train. If an observer sitting in the position 
M' in the train did not possess this velocity, then 
he would remain permanently at Af , and the light 
rays emitted by the flashes of lightning A and B 
would reach him simultaneously, i.e. they would 
meet just where he is situated. Now in reality 
(considered with reference to the railway embank- 
ment) he is hastening towards the beam of light 
coming from J?, whilst he is riding on ahead of the 
beam of light coming from il. Hence the observer 
will see the beam of light emitted from B earlier 
than he will see that emitted from A. Observers 
who take the railway train as their reference-body 

* As judged from the embankment. 



>i 



M SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

must therefore come to the conclusion that the 
lightning flash B took place earlier than the light- 
ning flash A. We thus arrive at the important 
result: 

Events which are simultaneous with reference 
to the embankment are not simultaneous with 
respect to the train, and vice versa (relativity of 
simultaneity). Every reference-body (co-ordinate 
S3rstem) h?i^ iti^ nwn paYtimJaf tjmft; imless we 

are told the reference-body to which the statement 
of time refers, there is no meaning in a statement 
of the time of an event. 

Now before the advent of the theory of relativity 
it had always tacitly been assumed in physics 
that the statement of time had an absolute 
significance, i.e. that it is independent of the state 
of motion of the body of reference. But we have 
just seen that this assumption is incompatible 
with the most natural definition of simultaneity; 
if we discard this assiunption, then the conflict 
between the law of the propagation of light in 
vacuo and the principle of relativity (developed 
in Section VII) disappears. 

We were led to that conflict by the considera- 
tions of Section VI, which are now no longer 
tenable. In that section we concluded that the 
man in the carriage, who traverses the distance 
w per second relative to the carriage, traverses the 
same distance also with respect to the embank- 



RELATIVITY OP SIMULTANEITY M 

ment in each second of time. But, according to 
the foregoing considerations, the time required by 
a particular occurrence with respect to the carriage 
must not be considered equal to the duration of 
the same occurrence as judged from the embank- 
ment (as reference-body). Hence it cannot be 
contended that the man in walking travels the 
distance w relative to the railway line in a time 
which is equal to one second as judged from the 
embankment. 

Moreover, the considerations of Section VI are 
based on yet a second asstmiption, which, in the 
light of a strict consideration, appears to be 
arbitrary, although it was always tacitly made 
even before the introduction of the theory of 
relativity. 



ON THE RELATIVITY OF THE CONCEPTION 

OF DISTANCE 

LET us consider two particulax points on the 
train ^ travelling along the embankment 
with the velocity Vj and inquire as to their 
distance apart. We already know that it is neces- 
sary to have a body of reference for the measure- 
ment of a distance, with respect to which body 
the distance can be measured up. It is the simplest 
plan to use the train itself as the reference-body 
(co-ordinate system). An observer in the train 
measures the interval by marking off his measur- 
ing-rod in a straight line (e.g. along the floor of 
the carriage) as many times as is necessary to 
take him from the one marked point to the other. 
Then the munber which tells us how often the 
rod has to be laid down is the required distance. 

It is a different matter when the distance has 
to be judged from the railway line. Here the 
following method suggests itself. If we call A' 
and B^ the two points on the train whose distance 
apart is required, then both of these points are 

^ €.g. tbe middle of the fint and of tbe hundredth ceniace. 



THE BELAnvrry of distance ss 

moving with the velocity v along the embankment. 
In the first place we require to determine the 
points A and B^ of the embankment which are 
just being passed by the two points A^ and B^ 
at a particular time / — judged from the embank- 
ment These points A and B of the embankment 
can be determined by applying the definition of 
time given in Section Vni. The distance between 
these points A and B is then measured by repeated 
application of the measuring-rod along the em- 
bankment. 

A priori it is by no means certain that this last 
measiurement will supply us with the same result 
as the first. Thus the length of the train as 
measured from the embankment may be different 
from that obtained by measiiring in the train 
itself. This circumstance leads uis to a second 
objection which must be raised against the ap- 
parently obvious consideration of Section VI. 
Namely, if the man in the carriage covers the 
distance w in a unit of time — measured from the 
train f — then this distance — as measured from the 
embankment — is not necessarily alsoequal to w. 



XI 

I 

THE LORENTZ TRANSFORMATION ' 

THE results of the last three sections show 
that the apparent incompatibility of the 
law of propagation of light with the principle 
of relativity (Section VII) has been derived by 
means of a consideration which borrowed two 
mijustifiable hjrpotheses from classical mechanics; 
these are as follows: 

(i) The time-interval (time) between two events 
is independent of the condition of motion 
of the body of reference. 

(a) The space-interval (distance) between two 
points of a rigid body is independent of 
the condition of motion of the body of 
reference. 

If we drop these hypotheses, then the dilenmia 
of Section Vn disappears, because the theorem of 
the addition of velocities derived in Section VI 
becomes invalid. The possibility presents itself 
that the law of the propagation of light in vacuo 
may be compatible with the principle of relativity, 
and the question arises: How have we to modify 
the considerations of Section VI in order to remove , 

86 



^ 



THE LORENTZ TRANSFORMATION 37 

the apparent disagreement between these two 
fundamental results of experience? This question 
leads to a general one. In the discussion of 
Section VI we have to do with places and times 
relative both to the train and to the embankment. 
How are we to find the place and time of an event 
in relation to the train, when -we know the place 
and time of the event with respect to the railway 
embankment? Is there a thinkable answer to this 
question of such a nature that the law of transmis- 
sion of light in vacuo does not contradict the 
principle of relativity? In other words: Can we 
conceive of a relation between place and time of 
the individual events relative to both reference- 
bodies, such that every ray of light possesses the 
velocity of transmission c relative to the embank- 
ment and relative to the train? This question 
leads to a quite definite positive answer, and to a 
perfectly definite transformation law for the space- 
time magnitudes of an event when changing over 
from one body of reference to another. 

Before we deal with this, we shall introduce the 
following incidental consideration. Up to the 
present we have only considered events taking 
place along the embankment, which had mathe- 
matically to assxmie the function of a straight line. 
In the manner indicated in Section II we can 
imagine this reference-body supplemented later- 
ally and in a vertical direction by means of a 



88 SPECIAL THEORY OP RELATTVITY 

framework of rods, so that an event which takes 
place anywhere can be localised with reference 
to this framework/ Similarly, we can imagine 
the train travelling with the velocity v to be 
continued across the whole of space, so that every 
event, no matter how far oS it may be, could also 
be localised with respect to the second framework. 
Without committing any fundamental error, we 
can disregard the fact that in reality these frame- 
works woxild continually interfere with each other, 
owing to the impenetrability of solid bodies. In 
every such framework we imagine three siuiaces 
perpendicular to each other marked out, and 
designated as "co-ordinate planes" ("co-ordinate 
system"). A co-ordinate system K then corre- 
sponds to the embankment, and a co-ordinate 
system X' to the train. An event, wherever it 
may have taken place, would be fixed in space 
with respect to K by the three perpendiculars 
Xy y, z on the co-ordinate planes, and with regard 
to time by a time-value t. Relative to ^', the 
same event woxild be fixed in respect of space and 
time by corresponding values a;', y', 2', f', which 
of course are not identical with x, y, z, /. It has 
already been set forth in detail how these magni- 
tudes are to be regarded as results of physical 
measurements. 

Obviously our problem can be exactly formu- 
lated in the following manner. What are the 



r 



/ 



THE LOEENTZ TRANSFORMATION 89 

values x\ /, 2', I' of an event with respect to K\ 
when the magnitudes x^ y, 2, /, of the same event 
with respect to J^ are given? The relations must 
be so chosen that the law 
of the transmission of 
light in vacuo is satisfied 
for one and the same ray 
of light (and of course for 
every ray) with respect to 
K and K\ For the rela- 
tive orientation in space 
of the co-ordinate systems indicated in the diagram 
(Fig. 2), this problem is solved by means of the 
equations: 




Fio. 2. 



x'- 






This sjrstem of equations is known as the '^Lorentz 
transformation." * 

If in place of the law of transmission of light we 
had taken as our basis the tadt assumptions of 
the older mechanics as to the absolute character 

1 A simple derivation of the Lorentz transformation is given in 
Appendix I. 



40 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

of times and lengths, then instead of the above we 
should have obtained the following equations: 

This S3rstem of equations is often termed the 
'' Galilei transformation." The Galilei transforma- 
tion can be obtained from the Lorentz trans- 
formation by substituting an infinitely large value 
for the velocity of light c in the latter trans- 
formation. 

Aided by the following illustration, we can 
readily see that, in accordance with the Lorentz 
transformation, the law of the transmission of 
light in vacuo is satisfied both for the reference- 
body K and for the reference-body K\ A light- 
signal is sent along the positive x-axis, and this 
light-stimulus advances in accordance with the 
equation 

i.e. with the velocity c. According to the equations 
of the Lorentz transformation, this simple rela- 
tion between x and t involves a relation between 
x^ and f. In point of fact, if we substitute for 
X the value ct in the first and fourth equations of 
the Lorentz transformation, we obtain: 

(c - v)t 



Oi m 






THE LOBENTZ TRANSFORMATION 41 



t 






from which, by division, the expression 

hnmediately follows. If referred to the system JST', 
the propagation of light takes place according to 
this equation. We thus see that the velocity of 
transmission relative to the reference-body K^ is 
also equal to c. The same result is obtained for 
rays of light advancing in any other direction 
whatsoever. Of course this is not surprising, 
smce the equations of the Lorentz transformation 
were derived conformably to this point of view. 



xn 

THE BEHAVIOUR OF MEASURING-RODS ^AND 

CLOCKS IN MOTION 

I PLACE a metre-rod in the aZ-axis of K^ in 
such a manner that one end (the beginning) 
coincides with the point a/^o, whilst the 
other end (the end of th rod) coincides with the 
point a/ = I. What is the length of the metre- 
rod relatively to the system Ki In order to learn 
this, we need only ask where the beginning of the 
rod and the end of the rod lie with respect to K 
at a particular time t of the system K. By means 
of the first equation of the Lorentz transformation 
the values of these two points at the time / » o 
can be shown to be 

-« \ 1 

*(begiimmg of rod) ^"\ ^ " ^ 



'(end of rod) 



"'•V^-J' 



the distance betweea the points beu>g\/. - ^. 

But the metre-rod is moving with the velocity v 
relative to K. It therefore follows that the length 
of a rigid metre-rod moving in the direction of its 
length with a velocity v is V i - t^/c^ of a metre. 
The rigid rod is thus shorter when in motion than 

4S 



BODS AND CLOCKS IN MOTION 43 

when at rest, and the more qxiickly it is moving, 
the shorter is the r od. For the velocity v^c 
we should have V i - i^/c* - o, and for still 
greater velocities the square-root becomes im- 
aginary. From this we conclude that in the 
theory of relativity the velocity c plays the part 
of a limiting velocity, which can neither be reached 
aor .exceeded by any real body. 

Of comrse this feature of the velocity c as a 
limiting velocity also clearly follows from the 
equations of the Lorentz transformation, for these 
become meaningless if we choose values of v 
greater than c. 

If, on the contrary, we had considered a metre- 
rod at rest in the x-3j6s with respect to IT, then we 
should have found that the length of the rod as 
judged from Jf ' would have been V i - x;* / c^; this 
is quite in accordance with the principle of rela- 
tivity which forms the basis of our considerations. 

A priori it is quite clear that we must be able to 
leam something about the physical behaviour of 
measiuing-rods and clocks from the equations of 
transformation, for the magnitudes Xj y, 2, /, are 
nothing more nor less than the results of measure- 
ments obtainable by means of measmdng-rods and 
clocks. If we had based our considerations on the 
Galilei transformation we should not have ob- 
tained a contraction of the rod as a consequence 
of its motion. 



44 SPECIAL THEORY OP RELATIVITY 

Let us now consider a seconds-dock which is 
permanently situated at the origin (a/ » o) of K'. 
^ « o and ^ » I are two successive ticks of this 
clocL The first and fourth equations of the 
Lorentz transformation give for these two ticks: 

and 



I 



V^-l 



As judged from Kj the dock is moving with 
the velocity v\ as judged from this reference-body, 
the time which elapses between two strokes of the 

dock is not one second, but i seconds, i.e. 

a somewhat larger time. As a consequence of its 
motion the clock goes more slowly than when at 
rest. Here also the velodty c plajrs the part of 
an unattainable limiting velodty. 



xm 

THEOREM OF THE ADDITION OF VELOCITIES. 
THE EXPERIMENT OF FEEAU 

NOW in practice we can move clocks and 
measuring-rods only with velocities that 
are small compared with the velocity of 
Ught; hence we shall hardly be able to compare 
the results of the previous section directly with 
the reality. But, on the other hand, these results 
must strike you as being very singular, and for 
that reason I shall now draw another conclusion 
from the theory, one which can easily be derived 
from the foregoing considerations, and which has 
been most elegantly confirmed by experiment. 

In Section VI we derived the theorem of the 
addition of velocities in one direction in the form 
which also results from the hypotheses of classical 
mechanics. This theorem can also be deduced 
readily from the Galilei transformation (Section 
XI). In place of the man walking inside the 
carriage, we introduce a point moving relatively 
to the co-ordinate system K! in accordance with 
the equation 

By means of the first and fourth equations of the 

45 



! 



48 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVrrY 

Galilei transformation we can express ^ and i 
in terms of x and ty and we then obtain 

« - (» + w)<. 

This equation expresses nothing else than the law 
of motion of the point with reference to the system 
K (of the man with reference to the embankment). 
We denote this velocity by the symbol W^ and we 
then obtain^ as in Section VI, 

IT = » + w (A). 

But we can carry out this consideration just as 
well on the basis of the theory of relativity. In 
the equation 

we must then express a/ and ^ in terms of x and /, 
making use of the first and fourth equations of the 
Larentz transformation. Instead of the equation 
(A) we then obtain the equation 

W~'-±^ (B), 

which corresponds to the theorem of addition for 
velocities in one direction according to the theory 
of relativity. The question now arises as to which 
of these two theorems is the better in accord with 
experience. On this point we are enlightened by 
a most important experiment which the brilliant 
physicist Fizeau performed more than half a 
century ago, and which has been repeated since 



^ 



THE EXPERIMENT OP PIZEAU 47 

then by some of the best experimental ph3rsidstS| 
so that there can be no doubt about its result. 
The experiment is concerned with the following 
question. Light travels in a motionless liquid 
with a particular velocity w. How quickly does 
it travel in the direction of the arrow in the tube T 
(see the accompanying diagram. Fig. 3) when the 
liquid above mentioned is flowing through the 
tube with a velocity v? 

In accordance with the principle of relativity 
we shall certainly have to take for granted that 
the propagation of light always takes place with 
the same velocity w with respect to the liquidy 
whether the latter is in motion with reference to 
other bodies or not. The velocity of light relative 
to the liquid and the velocity of the latter relative 
to the tube are thus known, and we require the 
velocity of light relative to the tube. 

It is clear that we have the problem of Section 
VI again before us. The tube plays the part of 



Fig. 3 

the railway embankment or of the co-ordinate 
system K, the liquid plays the part of the carriage 
or of the co-ordinate system K\ and finally, the 
Ught plays the part of the man walking along the 
carriage, or of the moving point in the present 



48 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

section. If we denote the velocity of the light 
relative to the tube by W^ then this is given by 
the equation (A) or (B), according as the Galilei 
transformation or the Lorentz transformation 
corresponds to the facts. Experiment ^ decides in 
favour of equation (B) derived from the theory of 
relativity, and the agreement is, indeed, very 
exact. According to recent and most excellent 
measurements by Zeeman, the influence of the 
velocity of flow v on the propagation of light 
is represented by formula (B) to within one 
per cent. 

Nevertheless we must now draw attention to 
the fact that a theory of this phenomenon was 
given by H. A. Lorentz long before the statement 
of the theory of relativity. This theory was of a 
purely electrodynamical nature, and was obtained 
by the use of particular hypotheses as to the 
electromagnetic structiure of matter. This circum- 
stance, however, does not in the least diminish 
the conclusiveness of the experiment as a crucial 
test in favour of the theory of relativity, for the 

* Fizeau found TT-w + vfi- % j, where n - - is the index 
of refraction of the liquid. On the other hand, owing to the smaU- 
ness of ^ as compared with i, we can replace (B) in the first place 

by TF - (w + 9) fi - -^ j, or to the same order of approximation by 

19^-9^1- — ^ which agrees with Fizeau's result 



THE EXPERIMENT OF FIZEAU 49 

dectrod3aiamics of Maxv^ell-Lorentz, on which the 
original theory was based, in no way opposes the 
theory of relativity. Rather has the latter been 
developed from electrodynamics as an astoimdingly 
simple combination and generalisation of the 
hypotheses, formerly independent of each other, 
on which electrodjoiamics was built 



XIV 

THE HEURISTIC VALUE OF THE THEORY OF 

RELATIVITY 

OUR train of thought in the forgoing pages 
can be epitomised in the following manner. 
Experience has led to the conviction that, 
on the one hand, the principle of relativity holds 
truei and that on the other hand the velocity of 
transmission of Ught in vacuo has to be considered 
equal to a constant c. By uniting these two postu- 
lates we obtained the law of transformation for 
the rectangular co-ordinates Xy y^ z and the time 
/ of the events which constitute the processes of 
nature. In this connection we did not obtain 
the Galilei transformation, but, differing from 
classical mechanics, the Larentz transformatian. 

The law of transmission of light, the acceptance 
of which is justified by our actual knowledge, 
played an important part in this process of thought. 
Once in possession of the Lorentz transformation, 
however, we can combine this with the principle 
of relativity, and sum up the theory thus: 

Every general law of natiure must be so con- 
stituted that it is transformed into a law of 

* 

exactly the same form when, instead of the space- 

60 



HEURISTIC VALUE OP RElATIVlTY 51 

time variables x^ y^ z^ t of the original co-ordinate 
system if, we introduce new space-time variables 
^'> y\ 2', f of a co-ordinate system K\ In this 
connection the relation between the ordinary and 
the accented magnitudes is given by the Lorentz 
transformation. Or, in brief: General laws of 
nature are co-variant with respect to Lorentz 
transformations. 

This is a definite mathematical condition that 
the theory of relativity demands of a natural law, 
and in virtue of this, the theory becomes a valuable 
heuristic aid in the search for general, laws of 
nature. If a general law of nature were to be found 
which did not satisfy this condition, then at least 
one of the two fundamental assumptions of the 
theory would have been disproved. Let us now 
exanune what general results the latter theory 
has hitherto evinced. 



XV 

GENERAL RESULTS OF THE 

IT is deax from our previous considerations that 
the (special) theory of relativity has grown 
out of electrodynamics and optics. In these 
fields it has not appreciably altered the predictions 
of theory, but it has considerably simplified the 
theoretical structure^ i.e. the derivation of laws, 
and — what is incomparably more important — it 
has considerably reduced the number of inde- 
pendent hypotheses forming the basis of theory. 
The special theory of relativity has rendered the 
Maxwell-Lorentz theory so plausible, that the 
latter would have been generally accepted by 
physicists even if experiment had decided less 
uneqmvocally in its favour. 

Classical mechanics required to be modified 
before it could come into line with the demands 
of the special theory of relativity. For the main 
part, however, this modification affects only the 
laws for rapid motions, in which the velocities of 
matter v are not very small as compared with the 
velocity of light. We have experience of such 
rapid motions only in the case of electrons and 



GENERAL RESULTS OP THEORY 58 

ions; for other motions the variations from the 
laws of classical mechanics are too small to make 
themselves evident in practice. We shall not 
consider the motion of stars until we come to 
speak of the general theory of relativity. In 
accordance with the theory of relativity the 
kinetic energy of a material point of mass m is no 
longer given by the well-known expression 

but by the expression 




This expression approaches infinity as the velocity 
V approaches the velocity of light c. The velocity 
must therefore always remain less than c, however 
great may be the energies used to produce the 
acceleration. K we develop the expression for 
the kinetic energy in the form of a series, we 
obtain 

i«?+m- + |m^+ .... 

' When ~ is small compared with unity, the third 

of these terms is always small in comparison with 
the second, which last is alone considered in classi- 
cal mechanics. The first term mc^ does not contain 
the velocity, and requires no consideration if we 



54 SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVnT 

axe only dealing with the question as to how the 
energy of a point-mass depends on the velocity. 
We shall speak of its essential significance later. 

The most important result of a general character 
to which the special theory of relativity has led is 
concerned with the conception of mass. Before 
the advent of relativity, physics recognised two 
conservation laws of fundamental importance, 
namely, the law of^the conservation of energy 
and the law of the conservation of mass; these 
two fundamental laws appeared to be quite in- 
dependent of each other. By means of the 
theory of relativity they have been united into one 
law. We shall now briefly consider how this 
unification came about, and what meaning is to 
be attached to it. ^ 

The principle of relativity'requires that the law 
of the conservation of energy should hold not 
only with reference to a co-ordinate system jBT, 
but also with respect to every co-ordinate system 
K' which is in a state of uniform motion of transla- 
tion relative to If, or, briefly, relative to every 
"Galileian" S3rstem of co-ordinates. In contrast 
to classical mechanics, the Lorentz transformation 
is the deciding factor in the transition from one 
such sjTstem to another. 

By means of comparatively simple considera- 
tions we are led to draw the following conclusion 
from these premises, in conjunction with the 



GENERAL RESXJLTS OF THEORY 65 

fundamental equations of the electrodynamics of 
Maxwell: A body moving with the velocity r, 
which absorbs^ an amount of energy Eq in the 
form of radiation without suffering an alteration 
in velocity in the process, has, as a consequence, 
its energy increased by an amount 

Eo 



v 






In consideration of the expression given above 
for the kinetic energy of the body, the required 
eneigy of the body comes out to be 






Thus the body has the same energy as a body 
of mass (»» + -i] moving with the velocity v. 

Hence we can say: If a body takes up an amount 
of energy £o> then its inertial mass increases by an 

amoimt ^ ; the inertial mass of a body is not a 

constant, but varies according to the change in 
the energy of the body. The inertial mass of a 
system of bodies can even be regarded as a measure 

^ £o is the eneigy taken up, as judged from a G(H)idiiiate system 
moving with the body. 



56 SPECIAL THEORY OP RELATIVITY 

of its eneigy. The law of the conservation of the 
mass of a system becomes identical with the law 
of the conservation of eneigyi and is only valid 
provided that the system neither takes up nor 
sends out energy. Writing the expression for the 
energy in the form 



v/ 



we see that the term mc^, which has hitherto 
attracted out attention, is nothing else than the 
energy possessed by the body ^ before it absorbed 
the energy Eq. 

A direct comparison of this relation with ei^ri- 
ment is not possible at the present time, owing to 
the fact that the changes in energy Eq to which we 
can subject a system are not large enough to make 
themselves perceptible as a change in the inertial 

mass of the system. -^ is too small in comparison 

with the mass m^ which was present before the 
alteration of the energy. It is owing to this circum- 
stance that classical mechanics was able to es- 
tablish successfully the conservation of mass as a 
law of indq>endent validity. 

Let me add a final remark of a fundamental 
nature. The success of the Faraday-Maxwell 

1 As judged from a co-ordinate system moving with the body. 



GENERAL RESULTS OF THEORY 57 

interpretation of electromagnetic action at a dis- 
tance resulted in physicists becoming convinced 
that there are no such things as instantaneous 
actions at a distance (not involving an inter- 
mediary medium) of the type of Newton's law of 
gravitation. According to the theory of relativity, 
action at a distance with the velocity of light 
always takes the place of instantaneous action at 
a distance or of action at. a distance with an in- 
finite velocity of transmission. This is connected 
with the fact that the velocity c plays a f xmda- 
mental r61e in this theory. In Part II we shall see 
in what way this result becomes modified in the 
general theory of relativity. ^ 



XVI 

EXPERIENCE AND THE SPECIAL THEORY 

OF RELATTVITY 

TO what extent is the special theory of rela- 
tivity supported by experience? This ques- 
tion is not easily answered for the reason 
already mentioned in connection with the funda- 
mental experiment of Fizeau. The special theory 
of relativity has crystallised out from the Maxwell- 
Lorentz theory of electromagnetic phenomena. 
Thus all facts of experience which support the 
electromagnetic theory also support the theory of 
relativity. As being of particular importance^ I 
mention here the fact that the theory of relativity 
enables us to predict the effects produced on the 
light reaching us from the fixed stars. These 
results are obtained in an exceedingly simple 
manner, and the effects indicated, which are due 
to the relative motion of the earth with reference 
to those fixed stars, are found to be in accord 
with experience. We refer to the yearly move- 
ment of the apparent position of the fixed stars 
resulting from the motion of the earth round the 
sun (aberration), and to the influence of the radial 



EXPERIENCE AND RELATIVITY 59 

components of the rdative motions of the fixed 
staxs with respect to the earth on the colour of 
the light reaching us from them. The latter effect 
manifests itself in a slight displacement of the 
spectral lifies of the light transmitted to us from 
a fixed star, as compared with the position of the 
same spectral lines when they are produced by a 
terrestrial source of Kght (Doppler principle). 
The experimental arguments in favour of the 
Maxwell-Lorentz theory, which are at the same 
time arguments in favour of the theory of rela- 
tivity, are too nxmierous to be set forth here. In 
reality they limit the theoretical possibilities to 
such an extent, that no other theoiy than that of 
Maxwell and Lorentz has been able to hold its 
own when tested by experience. 

But there are two classes of experimental facts 
hitherto obtained which can be represented in the 
Maxwell-Lorentz theory only by the introduction 
of an auxiliary hypothesis, which in itself — i.e. 
without making use of the theory of relativity — 
appears extraneous. 

It is known that cathode rays and the so-called 
iS-rays emitted by radioactive substances consist 
of negatively electrified particles (electrons) of 
very small inertia and large velocity. By examin- 
ing the deflection of these rajrs under the influence 
of electric and magnetic fields, we can study the 
law of motion of these particles very exactly. 



60 SPECIAL THEORY OP RELATIVITY 

In the theoretical treatment of these dectronSj 
we are faced with the difficulty that electro- 
dynamic theory of itself is imable to give an ac- 
coimt of their nature. For since electrical masses 
of one sign repel each other, the negative electrical 
masses constituting the electron would necessarily 
be scattered under the influence of their mutual 
repulsions, imless there are forces of another kind 
operating between them, the nature of which has 
hitherto remained obscure to us.^ If we now 
assume that the relative distances between the 
electrical masses constituting the electron remain 
unchanged during the motion of the electron 
(rigid connection in the sense of classical me- 
chanics), we arrive at a law of motion of the 
electron which does not agree with experience. 
Guided by purely formal points of view, H. A. 
Lorentz was the first to introduce the hypothesis 
that the particles constituting the electron ex- 
perience a contraction in the direction of motion 
in consequence of that motion, the amount of this 
contraction being proportional to the expression 

^- This h3rpothesis, which is not justifiable 

by any electrodynamical facts, supplies us then 
with that particular law of motion which has been 
confirmed with great precision in recent years. 

^ The general theory of relativity renders it likely that the dec- 
txical masses of an election are held together by gravitational forces. 



>r-l 



EXFBBIENCE AND RELATIVITY 61 

The theoiy of relativity leads to the same law 
of motion, without requiring any special hypothe- 
sis whatsoever as to the structure aad the be- 
haviour of the electron. We arrived at a similar 
conclusion in Section XIII in connection with the 
experiment of Fizeau, the result of which is fore- 
told by the theory of relativity without the ne- 
cessity of drawing on hypotheses as to the physical 
nature of the liquid. 

The second dass of facts to which we have 
alluded has reference to the question whether or 
not the motion of the earth in space can be made 
perceptible in terrestrial experiments. We have 
already remarked in Section V that all attempts 
of this nature led to a negative result. Before 
the theoiy of relativity was put forward, it was 
difficult to become reconciled to this negative 
result, for reasons now to be discussed. The in- 
herited prejudices about time and space did not 
allow any doubt to arise as to the prime importance 
of the Galilei transformation for changing over 
from one body of reference to another. Now 
assiuning that the Maxwell-Lorentz equations 
hold for a reference-body Jf , we then find that 
they do not hold for a reference-body K' moving 
imiformly with respect to if, if we assiraie that 
the relations of the Galileian transformation 
exist between the co-ordinates of K and K'. It 
thus appears that of all Galileian co-ordinate 



62 SPECIAL THEORY OP RELATIVITY 

systems one (K) corresponding to a particular 
state of motion is physically imique. This result 
was interpreted physically by regarding i^ as at 
rest with respect to a hypothetical aether of space. 
On the other hand, all co-ordinate systems K^ 
moving relatively to K were to be regarded as in 
motion with respect to the aether. To this motion 
of K^ against the aether ("aether-drift" relative to 
K') were assigned the more complicated laws 
which were supposed to hold relative to K\ 
Strictly speaking, such an aether-drift ought also 
to be assimied relative to the earth, and for a 
long time the efforts of physicists were devoted 
to attempts to detect the existence of an aether- 
drift at the earth's surface. 

In one of the most notable of these attempts 
Michelson devised a method which appears as 
though it must be decisive. Imagine two mirrors 
so arranged on a rigid body that the reflecting 
surfaces face each other. A ray of light requires 
a perfectly definite time T to pass from one mirror 
to the other and back again, if the whole system 
be at rest with respect to the aether. It is found 
by calculation, however, that a slightly different 
time T is required for this process, if the body, 
together with the mirrors, be moving relatively 
to the aether. And yet another point: it is shown 
by calculation that for a given velocity v with 
reference to the aether, this time T is different 



EXPERIENCE AND RELATIVITY «8 

when the body is moving perpendicularly to the 
planes of the mirrors from that resulting when 
the motion is parallel to these planes. Although 
the estimated difference between these two times 
is exceedingly small, Michelson and Morley 
performed an experiment involving interference 
in which this difference should have been clearly 
detectable- But the experiment gave a negative 
result — a fact very perplexing to physicists. 
Lorentz and FitzGerald rescued the theory from 
this difl&culty by assimiing that the motion of 
the body relative to the aether produces a contrac- 
tion of the body in the direction of motion, the 
amount of contraction being just sufficient to 
compensate for the difference in time mentioned 
above. Comparison with the discussion in Section 
XII shows that also from the standpoint of the 
theory of relativity this solution of the difficulty 
was the right one. But on the basis of the theory 
of relativity the method of interpretation is in- 
comparably more satisfactory. According to this 
theory there is no such thing as a "specially 
favoured" (imique) co-ordinate system to occasion 
the introduction of the aether-idea, and hence 
there can be no aether-drift, nor any experiment 
with which to demonstrate it. Here the contrac- 
tion of moving bodies follows from the two fun- 
damental principles of the theory without the 
introduction of particular hypotheses; and as the 



M SPECIAL THEORY OF BEIATIVITY 

prime factor involved in this contraction we find, 
not the motion in itself, to which we cannot 
attach any meaning, but the motion with respect 
to the body of reference chosen in the particular 
case in point. Thus for a co-ordinate system 
moving with the earth the mirror system of 
Michelson and Morley is not shortened, but it is 
shortened for a co-ordinate system which is at 
rest relatively to the stm. 



xvn 

MINKOWSKTS FOUR-DIMENSIONAL SPACE 

THE non-mathematician is seizied by a mys- 
terious shuddering when he hears of "four- 
dimensional" things, by a feeling not imlike 
that awakened by thoughts of the occult. And 
yet there is no more common-place statement than 
that the world in which we live is a four-dimen- 
sional space-time continuimi. 

Space is a three-dimensional continuimi. By 
this we mean that it is possible to* describe the 
position of a point (at rest) by means of three 
numbers (co-ordinates) oc, y, 2, and that there is 
an indefinite number of points in the neighbour- 
hood of this one, the position of which can be 
described by co-ordinates such as Xi, yi, Zu which 
may be as near as we choose to the respective 
values of the co-ordinates Xj y, z of the first point. 
In virtue of the latter property we speak of a 
"continuum," and owing to the fact that there 
are three co-ordinates we speak of it as being 
" three-dimensional." 

' Similarly, the world of phjrsical phenomena 
which was briefly called "world" by Minkowski 

65 



M SPECIAL THEOBY OF KEIATIVITY 

is naturally four-dimensioiial in the space-time 
sense. For it is con^x>sed of individual events, 
each of which is described by four numbers, 
namely, three spact co-ordinates x, y, z and a 
time co-ordinate, the time-value t. The "world" 
is in this sense also a continuum; for to every 
event there are as many "neighbouring" events 
(realised or at least thinkable) as we care to 
choose, the co-ordinates Xi, yi, Si, h of which differ 
by an indefinitely small amount from those of the 
event x, y, 2, / originally considered. That we 
have not been accustomed to regard the world 
in this sense as a four-dimensional continumn is 
due to the fact that in physics, before the advent 
of the theory of relativity, time played a different 
and more independent rdle, as compared with 
the q>ace co-ordinates. It is for this reason that , 
we have been in the habit of treating time as an 
independent continuum. As a matter of fact, 
according to classical mechanics, time is absolute, 
i.e. it is independent of the position and the condi- 
tion of motion of the system of co-ordinates. We 
see this expressed in the last equation of the 
Galileian transformation {f-t). 

The four-dimensional mode of consideration of 
the "world" is natural on the theory of relativity, 
since according to this theory time is robbed of its 
independence. This is shown by the fourth equa- 
tion of the Lorentz transformation: 



FOUB-DIMENSIONAL SPACE W 






, I l i II I I ' 



Moreoveri according to this equation the time 
difference A/' of two events with respect to K' 
does not in general vanish, even when the time 
difference A/ of the same events with reference to 
Evanishes. Pure "space-distance" of two events 
with respect to K results in "time-distance" of 
the same events with respect to K\ But the 
discovery of Minkowski, which was of importance 
for the formal development of the theory of rda* 
tivity, does not lie here. It is to be f oimd rather 
in the fact of his recognition that the f our-dimen* 
sional space-time continuum of the theory of rela- 
tivity, in its most essential formal properties, 
shows a pronounced relationship to the three- 
dimensional continuum of Euclidean geometrical 
space.^ In order to give due prominence to this 
relationship, however, we must replace the usual 
time co-ordinate / by an imaginary magnitude 

'^. a proportional to it. Under these condi- 
tions, the natural laws satisfying the demands of 
the (special) theory of relativity assume mathe- 
matical forms, in which the time co-ordinate pla}rs 
exactly the same rdle as the three space co- 
ordinates. Formally, these four co-ordinates 

^ Cf . tbe somewhat more detailed discuadon in Appendii II. 



88 SPECIAL THEORY OF BEIATIVITy 

correspond exax:tly to the three space co-ordinates 
in Euclidean geometry. It must be clear even to 
the non-mathematician that, as a consequence of 
this purely formal addition to our knowledge, the 
theory perforce gained deamess in no mean 
measure. 

These inadequate remarks can ^ve the reader 
only a vague notion of the important idea con- 
tributed by Minkowski. Without it the general 
theory of relativity, of which the f imdamental ideas 
are developed in the following pages, would perhaps 
have got no farther than its long clothes. Min- 
kowski's work is doubtless difficult of access to 
anyone inexperienced in mathematics, but since 
it is not necessary to have a very exact grasp of 
this work in order to understand the fimdamental 
ideas of either the special or the general theory of 
relativity, I shall at present leave it here, and 
shall revert to it only towards the end of Part II. 



PART II 
THE GENERAL THEORY OP RELATIVITY 

xvin 

SPECIAL AND GENERAL PRINCIPLE OF 

RELATIVITY 

THE basal principle, which was the pivot of all 
our previous considerationSi was the special 
principle of relativity, i.e. the principle of 
the physical relativity of all uniform motion. Let 
us once more analyse its meaning carefully. 

It was at aU times clear that, from the point of 
view of the idea it conveys to us, every motion 
must only be considered as a relative motion. 
Retmning to the illustration we have frequently 
used of the embankment and the railway carriage, 
we can express the fact of the motion here taking 
place in the foUowing two forms, both of which 
are equally justifiable : 

(a) The carriage is in motion relative to the 

embankment. 

(b) The embankment is in motion relative to 

the carriage. 

In (a) the embankment, in (b) the carriage, 
serves as the body of reference in otir statement 



70 GENERAL THEORY OF REIATIVITT 

of the motion taking place. If it is simply a 
question of detecting or of describing the motion 
involved, it is in principle immaterial to what 
reference-body we refer the motion. As already 
mentioned, this is self-evident, but it must not be 
confused with the much more comprehensive state- 
ment called " the principle of relativity," which we 
have taken as the basis of our investigations. 

The principle we have made use of not only 
maintains that we may equally well choose the 
carriage or the embankment as our reference-body 
for the description of any event (for this, too, is 
self-evident). Our principle rather asserts what 
follows: If we formulate the general laws of 
nature as they are obtained from experience, by 
making use of 

(a) the embankment as reference-body, 
\b) the rdlway carriage as ref erence-boky, 

then these general laws of nature (e.g. the laws of 
mechanics or the law of the propagation of light 
in vacuo) have exactly the same form in both cases. 
This can also be expressed as follows: For the 
physical description of natural processes, neither 
of the reference-bodies Kj K^ is xmique (lit. 
"specially marked out") as compared with the 
other. Unlike the first, this latter statement need 
not of necessity hold a priori; it is not contained 
in the conceptions of "motion" and "reference- 



SPECIAL AND GENERAL FBINCIFLE 71 

body" and derivable from them; only experience 
can decide as to its correctness or incorrectness. 

Up to the present, however, we have by no 
means maintained the equivalence of aU bodies 
of reference K in connection with the formulation 
of natural laws. Our course was more on the 
following lines. In the £j:st place, we started out 
from the assumption that there exists a reference- 
body £*, whose condition of motion is such that 
the Galileian law holds with respect to it: A 
particle left to itself and sufficiently far removed 
from all other particles moves uniformly in a 
straight line. With reference to K (Galileian 
reference-body) the laws of natmre were to be as 
simple as possible. But in addition to IT, all 
bodies of reference K' should be jpven preference 
in this sense, and they should be exactly equiva- 
lent to K for the formulation of natural laws, 
provided that they are in a state of uniform 
rectilinear and nonr^otary motion with respect to K; 
all these bodies of reference are to be regarded 
as Galileian reference-bodies. The validity of 
the principle of relativity was assimied only for 
these reference-bodies, but not for others {e.g. 
those possessing motion of a different kind). In 
this sense we speak of the specicd principle of 
relativity, or special theory of relativity. 

In contrast to this we wish to understand by 
the '' general principle of relativity" the following 



78 GENERAL THEORY OP RELATIVITY 

statement: All bodies of reference K^ K\ etc., 
are equivalent for the description of natural 
phenomena (formulation of the general laws of 
nature), whatever may be their state of motion. 
But before proceeding farther, it ou^t to be 
pointed out that this formulation must be re- 
placed later by a more abstract one, for reasons 
which will become evident at a later stage. 

Since the introduction of the special principle 
of relativity has been justified, every intellect 
which strives after generalisation must feel the 
temptation to venture the step towards the general 
principle of relativity. But a simple and ap- 
parently quite reliable consideration seems to 
suggest that, for the present at any rate, there is 
little hope of success in such an attempt. Let 
us imagine ourselves transferred to oiu: old friend 
the railway carriage, which is travelling at a 
imiform rate. As long as it is moving imiformly, 
the occupant of the carriage is not sensible of its 
motion, and it is for this reason that he can with- 
out reluctance interpret the facts of the case as 
indicating that the carriage is at rest, but the 
embankment in motion. Moreover, according 
to the special principle of relativity, this inter- 
pretation is quite justified also from a physical 
point of view. 

If the motion of the carriage is now changed 
into a non-uniform motion, as for instance by a 



SPECIAL AND GENERAL PRINCIPLE 78 

powerful application of the brakes, then the oc- 
cupant of the carriage experiences a correspond* 
ingly powerful jerk forwards. The retarded mo- 
tion is manifested in the mechanical behavioiu: 
of bodies relative to the person in the railway 
carriage. The mechanical behaviour is different 
from that of the case previously considered, and 
for this reason it would appear to be impossible 
that the same mechanical laws hold relatively to 
the non-unif ormly moving carriage, as hold with 
reference to the carriage when at rest or in uni- 
form motion. At all events it is clear that the 
Galileian law does not hold with respect to the 
non-uniformly moving carriage. Because of this, 
we feel compelled at the present juncture to grant 
a kind of absolute physical reality to non-uniform 
motion, in opposition to the general principle of 
relativity. But in what follows we shall soon 
see that this conclusion cannot be maintained. 



THE GRAVTTATIONAL FIELD 

"TF we pick up a stone and then let it go, why 
Jl^ does it faJl to the ground?*' The usual 
answer to this question is: ^^ Because it is 
attracted by the earth." Modem physics formu- 
lates the answer rather differently for the follow- 
ing reason. As a result of the more careful study 
of electromagnetic phenomena, we have come to 
regard action at a distance as a process impossible 
without the intervention of some intermediary 
mediimi. If, for instance, a magnet attracts a 
piece of iron, we cannot be content to regard this 
as meaning that the magnet acts directly on the 
iron through the intermediate empty space, but 
we are constrained to imagine — after the manner 
of Faraday — that the magnet alwa3rs calls 
Into being something physically real in the space 
aroimd it, that something being what we call a 
'^magnetic field." In its tum this magnetic field 
operate? on the piece of iron, so that the latter 
strives to move towards the magnet. We shall 
not discuss here the justification* for this incidental 
concq)tion, wMdi is indeed a somewhat arbi- 

74 



THE GRAVITATIONAL FIELD 75 

traiy one. We shall only mention that with its 
aid electroma^etic phenomena can be theoret- 
ically represented much more satisfactorily than 
without it, and this applies particularly to the 
transmission of electromagnetic waves. The 
efifects of gravitation also are regarded in an 
analogous manner. 

The action of the earth on the stone takes 
place indirectly. The earth produces in its sur- 
roundings a gravitational field, which acts on the 
stone and produces its motion of fall. As we 
know from experience, the intensity of the action 
on a body diminishes according to a quite definite 
law, as we proceed farther and farther away from 
the earth. From our point of view this means: 
The law governing the properties of the gravita- 
tional field in space must be a perfectly definite 
one, in order correctly to represent the diminution 
of gravitational action with the distance from 
operative bodies. It is something like this: The 
body (e.g. the earth) produces a field in its imme- 
diate neighbourhood directly; the intensity and 
direction of the field at points farther removed 
from the body are thence determined by the law 
which governs the properties in space of the 
gravitational fields themselves. 

In contrast to electric and magnetic fields, the 
gravitational field exhibits a most remarkable 
property, which is of fundamental importance 



76 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

for what follows. Bodies i/diich are moving under 
the sole inflnenffi of a gravitatioiial field receive 
an acceleration, which does not in the least-depend 
either on the material or on the physical state of the 
body. For instance, a piece of lead and a piece 
of wood fall in exactly the same manner in a 
gravitational fidd {in vacuo), when they start off 
from rest or with the same initial velocity. This 
law, which holds most accurately, can be e]q>ressed 
in a different form in the light of the following 
consideration. 
According to Newton's law of motion, we have 

(Force) » (inertial mass) X (acceleration), 

where the '^inertial mass" is a characteristic 
constant of the accelerated body. If now gravi- 
tation is the cause of the acceleration, we then 
have 

(Force) - (gravitational mass) X (intensity of the 

gravitational field), 

where the "gravitational mass" is likewise a 
characteristic constant for the body. From these 
two relations follows: 

gravitational field). 

If now, as we find from experience, the accelera- 
tion is to be independent of the nature and the 
condition of the body and always the same for a 



THE GRAVITATIONAL FIELD ?7 

given gravitational field, then the ratio of the 
gravitational to the inertial mass must likewise 
be the same for all bodies. By a suitable choice 
of units we can thus make this ratio equal to 
imity. We then have the following law: The 
gravitational mass of a body is equal to its inertial 
mass. 

It is true that this important law had hitherto 
been recorded in mechanics, but it had not been 
interpreted. A satisfactory interpretation can be 
obtained only if we recognise the following fact: 
The same quality of a body manifests itself ac- 
cording to circumstances as "inertia" or as 
"weight" (lit. "heaviness"). In the following 
section we shall show to what extent this is 
actually the case, and how this question is con- 
nected with the general postulate of relativity. 



THE EQUALITY OF INERTIAL AND GRAVITA- 
TIONAL MASS AS AN ARGUMENT FOR THE 
GENERAL POSTULATE OF RELATIVITY 

WE imagine a large portion of empty space, 
so far removed from stars and other 
appreciable masses that we have before 
us approximately the conditions required by the 
fundamental law of Galilei. It is then possible 
to choose a Galileian reference-body for this part 
of space (world), relative to which points at rest 
remain at rest and points in motion continue 
permanently in uniform rectilinear motion. As 
reference-body let us imagine a spacious chest 
resembling a room with an observer inside who 
is equipped with apparatus. Gravitation nat- 
urally does not exist for this observer. He must 
fasten himself with strings to the floor, otherwise 
the slightest impact against the floor will cause 
him to rise slowly towards the ceiling of the 
room. 

To the middle of the lid of the chest is fixed 
externally a hook with rope attached, and now a 
''being" (what kind of a being is immaterial to 

78 



INERTIAL AND GRAVITATIONAL MASS T9 

us) begins pulling at this with a constant force. 
The chest together with the observer then begin 
to move "upwards" with a uniformly accelerated 
motion. In course of time their velocity will 
reach unheard-K)f values — provided that we are 
viewing all this from another reference-body 
which is not being pulled with a rope. 

But how does the man in the chest regard the 
process? The acceleration of the chest will be 
transmitted to him by the reaction of the floor 
of the chest. He must therefore take up this 
pressure by means of his legs if he does not wish 
to be laid out full length on the floor. He is then 
standing in the chest in exactly the same way as 
anyone stands in a room of a house on our earth. 
If he release a body which he previously had in 
his hand, the acceleration of the chest will no 
longer be transmitted to this body, and for this 
reason the body will approach the floor of the 
chest with an accelerated relative motion. The 
observer will further convince himself that the 
acceleration of the body towards the floor of the chest V^ 
is always of the same magnitude^ whatever kind of 
body he may happen to tisefor the experiment. 

Relying on his knowledge of the gravitational 
field (as it was discussed in the preceding section), 
the man in the chest will thus come to the con- 
clusion that he and the chest are in a gravitational 
field which is constant with r^ard to time. Of 



80 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

course he will be puzzled for a moment as to idiy 
the chest does not fall in this gravitational field. 
Just then, however, he discovers the hook in the 
middle of the lid of the chest and the rope which 
is attached to it, and he consequent^ comes to 
the conclusion that the chest is suspended at rest 
in the gravitational field. 

Ought we to smile at the man and say that he 
errs in his conclusion? I do not believe we ought 
to if we wish to remain consistent; we must rather 
admit that his mode of grasping the situation 
vidates neither reason nor known mechanical 
laws. Even thou^ it is being accelerated with 
respect to the "Galileian space" first considered, 
we can nevertheless regard the chest as being at 
rest. We have thus good groxmds for extending 
the principle of relativity to include bodies of 
reference which are accelerated with respect to 
each other, and as a resxilt we have gained a 
powerful argument for a generalised postulate 
of relativity. 

We must note carefully that the possiblility of 
this mode of interpretation rests on the fundamen- 
tal property of the gravitational field of giving 
all bodies the same acceleration, or, what comes 
to the same thing, on the law of the equality of 
inertial and gravitational mass. If this natural 
law did not exist, the man in the accelerated chest 
would not be able to interpret the behavioiu: of 



r 



INEBTIAL AND GRAVITATIONAL MASS 81 

the bodies around him on the supposition of a 
gravitational field, and he would not be justified 
on the grounds of experience in supposing his 
reference-body to be "at rest." 

Suppose that the man in the chest fixes a rope 
to the inner side of the lid, and that he attaches 
a body to the free end of the rope. The result of 
this win be to stretch the^ rope so that it will 
hang "vertically" downwards. If we ask for an 
opinion of the cause of tension in the rope, the 
man in the chest will say: "The suspended body . 

experiences a downward force in the gravitational ^ f 
field, and this is neutralised by the tension of the 
rope; what determines the magnitude of the ten- 
sion of the rope is the gravitational mass of the 
suspended body." On the other hand, an ob- 
server who is poised freely in space will interpret 
the condition of things thus: "The rope must 
perforce take part in the accelerated motion of 
the chest, and it transmits this motion to the body 
attached to it. The tension of the rope is just 
large enough to effect the acceleration of the body. 
That which determines the magnitude of the ' ^ ^ -"^ 
tension of the rope is the inertial mass of the 
body." Guided by this example, we see that our 
extension of the principle of relativity implies 
the necessity of the law of the equality of inertial 
and gravitational mass. Thus we have obtained 
a physical interpretation of this law. 



1 , 
I 



v/ 



82 GENERAL THEORY OP RELATIVITY 

From our consideration of the accelerated chest 
we see that a general theory of relativity must 
yield important results on the laws of gravitation. 
In point of fact, the systematic pursuit of the 
general idea of relativity has supplied the laws 
satisfied by the gravitational field. Before pro- 
ceeding f arther, however, I must warn the reader 
against a misconception suggested by these con- 
siderations. A gravitational field exists for the 
man in the chest, despite the fact that there was 
no such field for the co-ordinate system first 
chosen. Now we might easily suppose that the 
existence of a gravitational field is always only 
an apparent one. We might also think that, 
regardless of the kind of gravitational field which 
may be present, we could alwajrs choose another 
reference-body such that no gravitational field 
exists with reference to it. This is by no means 
true for all gravitational fields, but only for those 
of quite special form. It is, for instance, im* 
possible to choose a body of reference such that, 
as judged from it, the gravitational field of the 
earth (in its entirety) vanishes. 

We can now appreciate why that argument is 
not convincing, which we brought forward against 
the general principle. of relativity at the end of 
Section XVIII. It is certainly true that the 
observer in the railway carriage experiences a 
jerk forwards as a result of the application of the 



INEBTIAL AND GRAVITATIONAL MASS 8S 

brake, and that he recognises in this the non- 
unifoimity of motion (retardation) of the carriage. 
But he is compelled by nobody to refer this jerk 
to a ^^real" acceleration (retardation) of the 
carriage. He might also interpret his experience 
thus: "My body of reference (the carriage) 
remains permanently at rest. With reference to 
it, however, there exists (during the period of 
application of the brakes) a gravitational field 
which is directed forwards and which is variable 
with respect to time. Under the influence of this 
field, the embankment together with the earth 
moves non-uniformly in such a manner that their 
original velocity in the backwards direction is 
continuously reduced.'' 



IN WHAT RESPECTS ARE TEE FOUNDATK>NS 
OF CLASSICAL MECHANICS AND OF THE 
SPECIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY UN- 
SATISFACTORY ? 

XT TE have aheady stated several tones that 
W classjcal merhanirs starts out from the 
following law: Material particles suf- 
ficiently far removed from other material particles 
continue to move uniform^ in a straight line 
or continue in a state of rest. We have also 
repeatedly enq>hasised that this fundamental law 
can only be valid for bodies of reference K which 
possess certain unique states of motion, and which 
are in unifonn tianslational motion relative to 
each other. Relative to other reference-bodies 
i^ the law b not valid. Both in classical mechanics 
and in the special theory of relativity we there- 
fore differentiate between reference-bodies K 
relative to which the recognised ''laws of nature" 
can be said to hold, and reference-bodies K 
relative to which these laws do not hold. 

But no person whose mode of thought is lo^cal 
can rest satisfied with this condition of things. 
He asks: ''How does it come that certain refer- 



MECHANICS AND RELATIVITY 80 

ence-foodies (or their states of motion) are given 
priority over other reference-bodies (or their 
states of motion)? What is the reason far this 
preference? '*In order to show clearly what I mean 
by this question, I shall make use of a comparison. 

I am standing in front of a gas range. Stand- 
ing alongside of each other on the range are two 
pans so much alike that one may be mistaken for 
the other. Both are half full of water. I notice 
that steam is being emitted continuously from the 
one pan, but not from the other. I am surprised at 
this, even if I have never seen either a gas range 
or a pan before. But if I now notice a luminous 
something of bluish colour under the first pan but 
not under the other, I cease to be astonished, even 
if I have never before seen a gas flame. For I 
can only say that this bluish something will cause 
the emission of the steam, or at least possibly it 
may do so. If, however, I notice the bluish 
something in neither case, and if I observe that 
the one continuously emits steam whilst the 
other does not, then I shall remain astonished 
and dissatisfied until I have discovered some 
circumstance to which lean attribute the different 
behaviour of the two pans. 

Analogously, I seek in vain for a real something 
in classical mechanics (or in the special theory 
of relativity) to which I can attribute the different 
behaviour of bodies considered with respect to 



80 GENERAL THEORY OF RELAUVTIT 

the reference-systems K and K\^ Newton saw 
this objection and attenq>ted to invalidate it, but 
without success. But E. Mach recognised it 
most dearly of all, and because of this objection 
he claimed that mechanics must be placed on a 
new basis. It can only be got rid of by means of 
a physics which is conformable to the general 
principle of relativity, since the equations of such 
a theory hold for every body of reference, whatever 
may be its state of motion. 

^ The objection is of importance more especially wben tbe state 
of motion of the lef erence-body is of such a nature that it does not 
require any external agency for its maintenance, $.§. in the cue when 
the refeceace-body is rotating imifonniy. 



A FEW INFERENCES FROM THE GENERAL 
PRINCIPLE OF RELATIVITY 

THE considerations of Section XX show that 
the general principle of relativity puts 
us in a position to derive properties of the 
gravitational field in a ptirely theoretical naanner. 
Let us suppose, for instance, that we know the 
space-time ^'course" for any natural process 
whatsoever, as regards the imimer in which it 
takes place in the Galileian domain relative to a 
Galileian body of reference K. By means of 
purely theoretical operations {i.e. simply by cal- 
culation) we are then able to find how this known 
natural process, appears, as seen from a reference- 
body K^ which is accelerated relatively to K. 
But since a gravitational field exists with respect 
to this new body of reference K\ our consideration 
also teaches us how the gravitational field in- 
fluences the process studied. 

For example, we leam that a body which is 
in a state of uniform rectilinear motioh with 
respect to K (in accordance with the law of 

Galilei) is executing an accelerated and in general 

sr 



88 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

curvilinear motion with respect to the accelerated 
reference-body K' (chest). This acceleration or 
ourvature corresponds to the influence on the 
moving body of the guvitational field prevailing 
relatively to K\ It is known that a gravita- 
tional field influences the movem^it of bodies in 
this way, so that our consideration supplies us 
with nothing essentially new. 

However, we obtain a new result of fundamental 
importance when we carry out the analogous 
consideration for a ray of li^t. With respect 
to the Galileian reference-body K^ such a ray of 
light is transmitted rectilinearly with the velocity 
c. It can easily be shown that the path of the 
same ray of light is no longer a straight line when 
we consider it with reference to the accelerated 
chest (reference-body K'). From this we con- 
clude, that^ in general^ rays of light are propagated 
ciirvilinearly in gravitational fields. In two re- 
spects this result is of great unportance. 

In the first place, it can be compared with the 
reality. Although a detailed examination of the 
question shows that the curvature of light rays 
required by the general theory of relativity is 
only exceedingly small for the gravitational fields 
at our disposal in practice, its estimated magni- 
tude for light rays passing the sim at grazing 
incidence is nevertheless 1-7 seconds of arc. This 
ought to manifest itself in the following way. 



DW1ERENCES FROM REIATIVITY 89 

» 

As seen from the eaxth, certain fixed stars appear 
to be in the neighbourhood of the sun, and are 
thus capable of observation during a total eclipse 
of the sun. At such times, these stars ought to 
appear to be displaced outwards from the sim 
by an amount indicated above, as compared with 
their apparent position in the sky when the sun 
is situated at another part of the heavens. The 
examination of the correctness or otherwise of 
this deduction is a problem of the greatest im- 
portance, the early solution of which is to be 
expected of astronomers.^ 

In the second place our result shows that, ac- 
cording to the general theory of relativity, the 
law of the constancy of the velocity of light in 
vacuoy which constitutes one of the two funda- 
mental assumptions in the special theory of 
relativity and to which we have already frequently 
referred, cannot claim any unlimited validity. 
A curvature of rays of light can only take place 
when the velocity of propagation of light varies 
with position. Now we might think that as a 
consequence of this, the special theory of relativity 
and with it the whole theory of relativity would 
be laid in the dust. But in reality this is not the 

1 By means of the star photographs of two expeditions equipped 
by a Joint Committee of the Ro3rd and Royal Astronomical Societies, 
the existence of the deflection of light demanded by theoiy was con- 
firmed during the solar eclipse of 39th May, 19x0. (Cf* Appendix 

m.) 



M GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

case. We can only conchide that the spedBl 
theory of relativity cannot daim an nnlimifri^^f 
domain of validity; its results hold only so long 
as we' are able to disr^ard the influences of 
gravitational fields on the phenomena {e.g. of 
light). 

Since it has often been contended by oppo- 
nents of the theory of relativity that the special 
theory of relativity is overthrown by the general 
theory of relativity, it is perlu^ advisable to make 
the facts of the case clearer by means of an 
appropriate comparison. Before the development 
of dectrodynamics the laws of electrostatics 
were lookel upon as the laws of dectridty. 
At the present time we know that dectric 
fidds can be derived correctly from dec- 
trostatic considerations only for the case, which 
is never strictly realised, in which the dectrical 
masses are quite at rest relatively to eadi other, 
and to the co-ordinate system. Should we be 
justified in saying that for this reason electro- 
statics is overthrown by the fidd-equations of 
Maxwell in electrodynamics? Not in the least 
Electrostatics is contsuned in dectrodynamics 
as a limiting case; the laws of the latter lead 
directly to those of the former for the case in which 
the fields are invariable with regard to time. 
No fairer destiny could be allotted to any physical 
theory, than that it should of itself point out the 



INFERENCES FROM RELATIVITY •! 

way to the introduction of a more comprehensive 
theory, in which it lives on as a limiting case. 

In the example of the transmission of light just 
dealt with, we have seen that the general theory 
of relativity enables us to derive theoretically 
the influence of a gravitational field on the course 
of natural processes, the laws of which are already 
known when a gravitational field is absent. But 
the most attractive problem, to the solution of 
which the general theory of relativity supplies 
the key, concerns the investigation of the laws 
satisfied by the gravitational field itself. Let us 
consider this for a moment. 

We are acquainted with space-time domains 
which behave (approximately) in a "Galileian" 
fashion imder suitable choice of reference-body, 
i.e. domains in which gravitational fields are 
absent. If we now refer such a domain to a 
reference-body K^ possessing aily kind of motion, 
then relative to K^ there exists a gravitational 
field which is variable with respect to space and 
time.^ The character of this field will of course 
depend on the motion chosen for K\ Accord- 
ing to the general theory of relativity, the general 
law of the gravitational field must be satisfied 
for all gravitational fields obtainable in this way. 
Even though by no means all gravitational fields 

^ This follows horn a generalisation of the discussion in Sec- 
tion XX. 



9S GENERAL THEORY OF REIATIVITY 

can be pioduced in this way, yet we may enter- 
tain the hope that the general law of gravitation 
will be derivable from such gravitational fields of 
a spedal kind. This hope has been realised in 
the most beautiful manner. But between the 
clear vision of this goal and its actual realisation 
it was necessary to surmount a serious difficulty, 
and as this lies deep at the root of things, I dare 
not withhold it from the reader. We require 
to extend our ideas of the qiace-time continuum 
still farther. 



xxm 

BEHAVIOUR OF CLOCKS AND MEASURING- 
HODS ON A ROTATING BODY 
OF REFERENCE 

HITHERTO I have pxirposely refrained 
from speaking about the physical in- 
terpretation of space- and time-data in 
the case of the general theory of relativity. As a 
consequence, I am guilty of a certain slovenliness 
of treatment, which, as we know from the spedal 
theory of relativity, is far from being unim- 
portant and pardonable. It is now high time 
that we remedy this defect; but I would mention 
at the outset, that this matter lays no small claims 
on the patience and on the power of abstraction 
of the reader. 

We start off again from quite special cases, 
which we have frequently used before. Let us 
consider a space-time domain in which no gravi- 
tational field exists relative to a reference-body 
K whose state of motion has been suitably chosen. 
K is then a Galileian reference-body as regards 
the domain considered, and the results of the 
special theory of relativity hold relative to K. 
Let us suppose the same domain referred to a 

08 



M 6ENEBAL THEORY OP BEIATIVITY 

second body of leference K\ wbkh is lotatiqg 
unif onnty with icspect toK. In order to fix our 
ideas, we shall imagine i^^ to be in the form of a 
plane circular disc, ipdiich rotates unifoimly in 
its own {dane about its centre. An observer 
who is sitting eccentiically on the disc K^ is 
sensible of a force which acts outwards in a radial 
direction, and which would be interpreted as an 
effect of inertia (centrifugal force) by an observer 
who was at rest with respect to the original 
reference-body K. But the observer on the disc 
may r^ard his disc as a ref erence-body^ which 
is '^at rest"; on the basis of the g^eral principle 
of relativity he is justified in doing this. The 
force acting on himself, and in fact on all other 
bodies whidi are at rest relative to the disc, he 
r^;ards as the effect of a gravitational field. 
Nevertheless, the ^pace-distribution of this gravi- 
tational fidd is of a kind that would not be possible 
on Newton'd theory of gravitation.^ But since 
the observer believes in the general theoiy of 
relativity, this does not disturb him; he is quite 
in the right when he believes that a general law 
of gravitation can be formulated — a law which 
not only explains the motion of the stars cor- 
rectly, but also the field of force e3^)erienced by 
himself. 

^ Tlie £M disappears at the centre of the disc and increases pro- 
portionally to the distance from the centre as we proceed outwards. 



BEHAVIOUR OF CLOCKS AND BODS 05 

The observer performs experiments on his dr- 
cular disc with docks and measuring-rods. In 
doing sOy it is his intention to arrive at exact 
definitions for the signification of time- and 
space-data with reference to the circular disc K\ 
these definitions being based on lus observations. 
What will be his experience in this enterprise? 

To start with, he places one of two identically 
constructed docks at the centre of the circular 
disc, and the other on the edge of the disc, so that 
they are at rest relative to it. We now ask our- 
selves whether both docks go at the same rate 
from the standpoint of the non-rotating Galileian 
reference-body K. As judged from this body, 
the dock at the centre of the disc has no vdodty, 
whereas the dock at the edge of the disc is in 
motion relative to iT in consequence of the rota- 
tion. According to a result obtained in Section 
XU, it follows that the latter dod^ goes at a rate 
permanently slower than that of the dock at 
the centre of the circular disc, i.e. as observed 
from K. It is obvious that the same effect would 
be noted by an observer whom we will imagine 
sitting alongside his dock at the centre of the 
circular disc. Thus on oxir circular disc, or, to 
make the case more general, in every gravitational 
field, a dock will go more quickly or less quickly, 
according to the position in which the dock is 
situated (at rest). For this reason it is not 



96 GENERAL THEORY OF REIATIVITY 

possible to obtain a reasonable definition of time 
with the aid of clocks wbidi are anangwl at 
rest with respect to the body of reference. A 
mnilar difficulty presents itself when we attenq>t 
to appfy our earlier definition of ^multandty in 
such a case, but I do not wish to go any farther 
into this question. 

Moreover, at this stage the definition of the 
space co-ordinates also presents unsuimountable 
difficulties. If the observer ^plies his standard 
measuring-iod (a rod which is short as compared 
with the radius of the disc) tangentially to the 
edge of the disc, then, as judged from the Galileian 
system, the length of this rod will be less than i, 
since, according to Section Xn, moving bodies 
suffer a shortening in the direction of the motion. 
On the other hand, the measuring-rod will not 
ea^rience a shortening in length, as judged from 
JST, if it is applied to the disc in the direction of 
the radius. If , then, the observer first measures 
the circumference of the disc with his measuring- 
rod and then the diameter of the disc, on divid- 
ing the one by the other, he will not obtain as 
quotient the familiar number v « 3.14 . . ., but 
a larger niunber,^ whereas of course, for a disc 
which is at rest with respect to IT, this operation 

1 Thiouc^bottt thii oonddecation we have to use the Galfleian 
(non-iotatiiig) lyBtcm K as reference-body, since we may only assume 
the validity of the results of the spedal theory of relativity relative 
to K (relative toK'% giavitational iSeld prevails). 



BEHAVIOUR OF CLOCKS AND RODS 07 

would yield ir exactly. This proves that the 
propositions of Euclidean geometry cannot hold 
exactly on the rotating disc, nor in general in a 
gravitational field, at least if we attribute the 
length I to the rod in all positioi^ and in every 
orientation. Hence the idea of a straight line 
also loses its meaning. We are therefore not in 
a position to define exactly the co-ordinates 
Xy y^ z relative to the disc by means of the method 
used in discussing the special theory, and as long 
as the co-ordinates and times of events have not 
been defined we cannot assign an exact meaning 
to the natural laws in which these occur. 

Thus all our previous conclusions based on 
general relativity would appear to be called in 
question. In reality we must make a subtle 
detour in order to be able to apply the postulate 
of general relativity exactly. I shall prepare 
the reader for this in the following paragraphs. 



100 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

of two numbers. I only need state how many 
rods I must pass over when, starting from the 
origin, I proceed towards the ^' right" and then 
"upwards," in order to arrive at the comer of the 
square imder consideration. These two nimibers 
are then the "Cartesian co-ordinates" of this 
comer with reference to the "Cartesian co- 
ordinate system" which is determined by the 
arrangement of little rods. 

By making use of the following modification 
of this abstract experiment, we recognise that 
there must also be cases in which the experiment 
would be imsuccessful. We shall suppose that 
the rods "expand" by an amount proportional to 
the increase of temperature. We heat the central 
part of the marble slab, but not the periphery, 
in which case two of our little rods can still be 
brought into coincidence at every position on 
the table. But our construction of squares must* 
necessarily come into disorder during the heating, 
because the little rods on the central region of 
the table expand, whereas those on the outer 
part do not. 

With reference to our little rods — defined as 
unit lengths — the marble slab is no longer a 
Euclidean continuimi, and we are also no longer 
in the position of defining Cartesian co-ordinates 
directly with their aid, since the above construc- 
tion can no longer be carried out. But since 



EUCLIDEAN AND NON-EUCXmEAN 101 

there are other things which axe not influenced 
in a similar manner to the little rods (or perhaps 
not at all) by the temperature of the table, it is 
possible quite naturally to maintain the point of 
view that the marble slab is a "Euclidean con- 
tinumn." This can be done in a satisfactory 
manner by making a more subtle stipulation 
about the measurement or the comparison of 
lengths. 

But if rods of every kind (i.e. of every material) 
were to behave in the same way as regards the 
influence of temperature when they are on the 
variably heated marble slab, and if we had no 
other means of detecting the effect of temperature 
than the geometrical behaviour of our rods in 
experiments analogous to the one described above, 
then our best plan would be to assign the distance 
one to two points on the slab, provided that the 
ends of one of our rods could be made to coincide 
with these two points; for how else should we 
define the distance without our proceeding being 
in the highest measure grossly arbitrary? The 
method of Cartesian co-ordinates must then be 
discarded, and replaced by another which does 
not assume the validity of Euclidean geometry 
for rigid bodies.* The reader will notice that 

* Mathematicians have been confronted with our problem in the 
following form. If we are given a surface {e.g. an ellipsoid) in Eucli- 
dean three-dimensional space, then there exists for this surface a 
two-dimensional geometry, just as much as for a plane surface. 



102 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITV 

the situation depicted here corresponds to the one 
brought about by the general postulate of relativity 
(Section XXIH). 

Gauss undertook the task of treating this two-dimensional geometry 
from first principles, without making use of the fact that the surface 
belongs to a Euclidean continuum of three dimensions. If we im- 
agine constructions to be made with rigid rods in the surface (similar 
to that above with the marble slab), we should find that different 
laws hold for these from those resulting on the ba^ of Euclidean 
plane geometry. The surface is not a Euclidean continuum with 
respect to the rods, and we cannot define Cartesian co-ordinates in 
the surface. Gauss indicated the principles according to which we 
can treat the geometrical relationships in the surface, and thus 
pointed out the way to the method of Riemann of treating multi- 
dimensional, non-Eudidean conUnua, Thus it is that mathemati- 
cians long ago solved the formal problems to which we are led by the 
general postulate of relativity. 






XXV 

GAUSSIAN CO-ORDINATES 

ACCORDING to Gauss, this combined ana- 
l3rtical and geometrical mode of handling 
the problem can be arrived at in the 
following way. We imagine a system of arbitrary 
curves (see Fig. 4) drawn on the surface of the 
table. These we designate as w-curves, and we 
indicate each of them by means of a number. 
The curves ««i, «=2 and « = 3 are drawn 
in the diagram. Between the curves u= i and 
tt « 2 we must imagine an ,,., 

infinitely large niunber to 
be drawn, all of which 
correspond to real num- 
bers lying between i and 
2. We have then a system 
of incurves, and this "in- ^' ^ 

finitely dense " system covers the whole surface of 
the table. These incurves must not intersect each 
other, and through each point of the surface one 
and only one curve must pass. Thus a perfectly 
definite value of u belongs to every point on the 
surface of the marble slab. In like manner we 

108 




104 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

imagine a sjrstem of tHnirves drawn on the surface. 
These satisfy the same conditions as the f^-curves, 
they are provided with nimibers in a correspond- 
ing manner, and they may likewise be of arbitrary 
shape. It follows that a value of u and a value 
of V belong to every point on the surface of the 
table. We call these two nxunbers the co-or- 
dinates of the siirface of the table (Gaussian 
co-ordinates). For example, the point P in the 
diagram has the Gaussian co-ordinates u^^^ 
» = I. Two neighboiujng points P and P' on 
the sxirface then correspond to the co-ordinates 

P: UyV 

P': u + dUfV + dVj 

where du and dv signify very small niunbers. In 
a similar manner we may indicate the distance 
(line-interval) between P and P', as measured 
with a little rod, by means of the very small 
number ds. Then according to Gauss we have 

d^ » gxL du^ + 2gvt dudv + gn dj^, 

where gu, gw, ^22, are magnitudes which depend 
in a perfectly definite way on u and v. The 
magnitudes gn, gu and ^22 determine the behaviour 
of the rods relative to the w-curves and ©-curves, 
and thus also relative to the surface of the table. 
For the case in which the points of the surface 
considered form a Euclidean continuum with 
reference to the measuring-rods, but only in this 
case, it is possible to draw the ^-curves and 



GAUSSIAN CO-ORDINATES 105 

T;-curves and to attach numbers to them^ in such 
a manner, that we simply have: 

Under these conditions, the ^-curves and iKnirves 
are straight lines in the sense of Eudidean geom- 
etry, and they are perpendicular to each other. 
Here the Gaussian co-ordinates are simply Car- 
tesian ones. It is dear that Gauss co-ordinates 
are nothing more than an association of two sets 
of numbers with the points of the surface con- 
sidered, of such a nature that nmnerical values 
differing very slightly from each other are asso- 
dated with neighbouring points "in space." 

So far, these considerations hold for a con- 
tinuum of two dimensions. But the Gaussian 
method can be applied also to a continuum of 
three, four or more dimensions. If, for instance, 
a continuiun of four dimensions be supposed 
available, we may represent it in the following 
way. With every point of the continuiun we 
associate arbitrarily four nxunbers, Xi^ Xt^ x$y X4, 
which are known as "co-ordinates." Adjacent 
points correspond to adjacent values of the co- 
ordinates. If a distance ds is associated with 
the adjacent points P and P\ this distance being 
measurable and well-defined from a physical point 
of view, then the following formula holds: 

d^ » gadxi* + 2gs^dXidx% .... +gudxff 



106 GENERAL THEOBY OF RELATIVITY 

wheie the magnitudes gn, etc., have values which 
vaiy with the position in the continuum. Only 
when the continuum is a Eudidean one is it 
possible to associate the co-ordinates opi • . 0:11 with 
the points of the continuum so that we have 
simply 

In this case relations hold in the four-dimensional 
continuum which are analogous to those holding 
in our three-dimensional measurements. 

However, the Gauss treatment for ^ which 
we have given above is not alwajrs possible. It 
is only possible when sufficiently small regions 
of the continuimi under consideration may be 
regarded as Euclidean continua. For example, 
this obviously holds in the case of the marble slab 
of the table and local variation of temperature. 
The temperatmre is practically constant for a 
small part of the slab, and thus the geometrical 
behaviour of the rods is dmost as it ought to be 
according to the rules of Euclidean geometry. 
Hence the imperfections of the construction of 
squares in the previous section do not show them- 
selves clearly until this construction is extended 
over a considerable portion of the surface of the 
table. 

We can sum this up as follows: Gauss invented 
a method for the mathematical treatment of 
continua in general, in which '' size-relations'' 



GAUSSIAN CO-ORDINATES 107 

C' distances'' between neighbouring points) are 
defined. To every point of a continuum axe 
assigned as many nmnbers (Gaussian co-ordi- 
nates) as the continuum has dimensions. This 
is done in such a way, that only one meaning can 
be attached to the assignment, and that nimibers 
(Gaussian co-ordinates) which differ by an in- 
definitely small amount are assigned to adjacent 
points. The Gaussian co-ordinate system is a 
logical generalisation of the Cartesian co-ordinate 
S3rstem. It is also applicable to non-Eudidean 
continua, but only when, with respect to the 
defined "size" or "distance," small parts of 
the continuum under consideration behave more 
nearly like a Euclidean system, the smaller the 
part of the continuum under our notice. 



% 



XXVI 

THE SPACE-TIME CONTINUUM OF THE SPE- 
CIAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY CONSID- 
ERED AS A EUCLIDEAN CONTINUUM 

XT TE aie now in a position to fonnulate 
VV more exactly the idea of Minkowski, 
windi was only vaguely indicated in 
Section XVn. In accordance with the q)ecial 
theory of relativity, certain co-ordinate systems 
are given preference for the description of the 
four-dimensionaly ^)ace-time continuum* We 
called these '^Galileian co-ordinate systems." 
For these systems, the four co-ordinates x^ y, 
2, /, ^i^ch determine an event or — in other 
words — a point of the four-dimensional con- 
tinuum, are defined physically in a simple manner, 
as set forth in detail in the first part of this book. 
For the transition from one Galileian sjrstem to 
another, which is moving uniformly with reference 
to the first, the equations of the Lorentz trans- 
formation are valid. These last form the basis 
for the derivation of deductions from the special 
theory of relativity, and in themselves they are 
nothing more than the expression of the universal 

106 



SPACE-TIME CONTINUUM 109 

validity of the law of transmission of light for all 
Galileian systems of reference. 

Minkowski f oimd that the Lorentz transforma- 
tions satisfy the foUowing simple conditions. 
Let us consider two neighbouring events, the 
relative position of which in the four-dimensional 
continuiun is given with respect to a Galileian 
reference-body K by the space co-ordinate dif- 
ferences dxy dyj dz and the time-difference dt. 
With reference to a second Galileian system we 
shall suppose that the corresponding differences 
for these two events are dx\ dy\ d^y dif. Then 
these magnitudes always fulfil the condition.^ 

The validity of the Lorentz transformation 
follows from this condition. We can express this 
as follows: The magnitude 

which belongs to two adjacent points of the four- 
dimensional space-time continuiun, has the same 
value for all selected (Galileian) reference-bodies. 
If we replace x^ y, 2, V^ d, by opi, 002, «•, «4, we 
also obtain the result that 

is independent of the choice of the body of ref er- 

^ Cf. Appendices I and n. The relations which are derived 
there for the coordinates themselves are valid also for co-ordinate 
differences, and thus also for co-ordinate differentials (indefinitely 
small differences). 



110 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

ence. We call the magnitude ds the ^^ distance" 
apart of the two events or four-dimensional points. 
Thus, if we choose as time-variable the im- 
aginary variable V"^ a instead of the real 

quantity /, we can regard the space-time con- 
tinuum — in accordance with the special theory 
of relativity — as a "Euclidean" four-dimensional 
continuimiy a result which follows from the 
considerations of the preceding section. 



xxvn 

THE SPACE-TIME CONTINUUM OF THE 
GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY IS 
NOT A EUCLIDEAN CONTINUUM 

IN the first paxt of this book we were able to 
make use of space-time co-ordinates which 
allowed of a simple and direct physical in- 
terpretation, and which, according to Section 
XXVI, can be regarded as four-dimensional 
Cartesian co-ordinates. This was possible on 
the basis of the law of the constancy of the ve- 
locity of light. But according to Section XXI, 
the general theory of relativity cannot retain 
this law. On the contrary, we arrived at the 
result that according to this latter theory the 
velocity of light must always depend on the co- 
ordinates when a gravitational field is pres- 
ent. In connection with a specific illustration in 
Section XXm, we found that the presence of 
a gravitational field invalidates the definition of 
the co-ordinates and the time, which led us to 
our objective in the special theory of relativity. 
In view of the results of these considerations 

we are led to the conviction that, according to 

111 



lit GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

the general principle of relativityi the spax:e-time 
continuum cannot be r^;arded as a Euclidean 
one, but that here we have the general case, 
correq;x>nding to the marble slab with local 
variations of temperaturei and with which we 
made acquaintance as an example of a two- 
dimensional continuiun. Just as it was there 
impossible to construct a Cartesian co-ordinate 
S3rstem from equal rods, so here it is impossible 
to build up a system (reference-body) from rigid 
bodies and clocks, which shall be of such a nature 
that measuring-rods and clocks, arranged rigidly 
with respect to one another, shall indicate posi- 
tion and time directly. Such was the essence of 
the diflSculty with which we were confronted in 
Section XXIII. 

But the considerations of Sections XXV and 
XXVI show us the way to surmount this diffi- 
culty. We refer the four-dimensional space-time 
continuum in an arbitrary manner to Gauss 
co-ordinates. We assign to every point of the 
continuum (event) four numbers, a;i, Xs, Xzj X4 
(co-ordinates), which have not the least direct 
physical significance, but only serve the purpose 
of numbering the points of the continuum in a 
definite but arbitrary manner. This arrangement 
does not even need to be of such a kind that we 
must r^ard Xu Xtj o^, as ^' space" co-ordinates 
and xa as a ^^time" co-ordinate. 



SPACE-TIME CONTINUUM IW 

The reader may think that such a description 
of the world would be quite inadequate. What 
does it mean to assign to an event the particular 
co-ordinates Xi, x%y xty x^y if in themselves these 
co-ordinates have no significance? More careful 
consideration shows, however, that this anxiety 
is imfounded. Let us consider, for instance, a 
material point with any kind of motion. If this 
point had only a momentary existence without 
duration, then it would be described in space- 
time by a single system of values oci, x^y xty x^. 
Thus its permanent existence must be char- 
acterised by an infinitely large number of such 
systems of values, the co-ordinate values of 
which are so dose together as to give continuity; 
corresponding to the material point, we thus have 
a (uni-dimensional) line in the four-dimensional 
continuimi. In the same way, any such lines 
in our continuiun correspond to many points in 
motion. The only statements having regard to 
these points which can claim a physical existence 
are in reality the statements about their en- 
counters. In our mathematical treatment, such 
an encoimter is expressed in the fact that the 
two lines which represent the motions of the 
points in question have a particular ssrstem of 
co-ordinate values, a;i, Xs, Xty x^y in common. 
After mature consideration the reader will doubt- 
less admit that in reality such encounters con* 



114 GENERAL THEORY OF BELATIVITY 

stitute the only actual evidence of a time-space 
nature with which we meet in physical statements. 
When we were describing the motion of a 
material point relative to a body of reference, we 
stated nothing more than the encounters of this 
point with particular points of the reference-body. 
We can also determine the corresponding values 
of the time by the observation of encoimters of 
the body with docks, in conjunction with the 
observation of the encounter of the hands of 
clocks with particular points on the dials. It is 
just the same in the case of space-measurements 
by means of measuring-rods, as a little considera- 
tion will show. 

1^ The following statements hold generally: Every 
physical description resolves itself into a nimxber 
of statements, each of which refers to the space- 
time coincidence of two events A and B. In 
terms of Gaussian co-ordinates, every such state- 
ment is expressed by the agreement of their four 
co-ordinates Xi, x%j Xtj Xi. Thus in reality, the 
description of the time-space continuum by 
means of Gauss co-ordinates completely replaces 
the description with the aid of a body of reference, 
without suflFering from the defects of the latter 
mode of description; it is not tied down to the 
Euclidean character of the continuum which has 
to be represented. 



xxvm 

EXACT FORMULATION OF THE GENERAL 
PRINCIPLE OF RELATIVITY 

XT TE are now in a position to replace the 
Y^ provisional formulation of the general 
principle of relativity given in Section 
XVni by an exact formulation. The form 
there used, "All bodies of reference K^ K\ etc., 
are equivalent for the description of natural 
phenomena (formulation of the general laws of 
nature), whatever may be their state of motion," 
cannot be maintained, because the use of rigid 
reference-bodies, in the sense of the method fol- 
lowed in the special theory of relativity, is in 
general not possible in space-time description. 
The Gauss co-ordinate system has to take the 
place of the body of reference. The following 
statement corresponds to the fundamental idea 
of the general principle of relativity: "il// Gaus- 
sian co-ordinate systems are essentially equivalent 
for the formulation of the general laws of naPure^ 
We can state this general principle of relativity 
in stjll another form, which renders it yet more 
dearly intelligible than it is when in the form of 



116 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

the natural extension of the special principle 
of relativity. According to the special theory of 
relativity, the equations which express the general 
laws of nature pass over into equations of the 
same form when, by making use of the Lorentz 
transformation, we replace the space-time variables 
^9 yy ^} '> of a (Galileian) reference-body K by the 
space-time variables x', /, zf, <', of a new reference- 
body K\ According to the general theory of 
relativity, on the other hand, by application of 
arbitrary substitutions of the Gauss variables Xi, 
0:29 Xzj Xij the equations must pass over into 
equations of the same form; for every transfor- 
mation (not only the Lor^itz transformation) 
corresponds to the transition of one Gauss co-ordi- 
nate system into another. 

If we desire to adhere to our "old-time" three- 
dimensional view of things, then we can char- 
acterise the development which is being under- 
gone by the ftmdamental idea of the general 
theory of relativity as follows: The special theory 
of relativity has reference to Galileian domains, 
i.e. to those in which no gravitational field exists. 
In this connection a Galileian reference-body 
serves as body of reference, i.e. a rigid body the 
state of motion of which is so chosen that the 
Galileian law of the imiform rectilinear mo- 
tion of "isolated" material points holds relatively 
to it. 



GENERAL PRINCIPLE OP RELATIVITY 117 

Certain considerations suggest that we should 
refer the same Galileian domains to non-GalUeian 
reference-bodies also. A gravitational field of a 
special kind is then present with respect to these 
bodies (cf. Sections XX and XXIII). 

In gravitational fields there are no such things 
as rigid bodies with EucUdean properties; thus 
the fictitious rigid body of reference is of no avail 
in the general theory of relativity. The motion 
of clocks is also influenced by gravitational fields, 
and in such a way that a physical definition of 
time which is made directly with the aid of clocks 
has by no means the same degree of plausibility 
as in the special theory of relativity. 

For this reason non-rigid reference-bodies are 
used which are as a whole not only moving in any 
way whatsoever, but which also suffer alterations 
in form ad lib. diuing their motion. Clocks, for 
which the law of motion is of any kind, however 
irregular, serve for the definition of time. We 
have to imagine each of these clocks fixed at a point 
on the non-rigid reference-body. These clocks 
satisfy only the one condition, that the "readings" 
which are observed simultaneously on adjacent 
docks (in space) differ from each other by an 
indefinitely small amount. This non-rigid refer- 
ence-body, which might appropriately be termed 
a "reference-mollusk," is in the main equivalent 
to a Gaxissian fomr-dimensional co-ordinate sys- 



118 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

tern chosen arbitrarily. That which gives the 
^^mollusk" a certain comprehensiveness as com- 
pared with the Gauss co-ordinate system is the 
(really xmjustified) formal retention of the sep- 
arate existence of the space co-ordinates as op- 
posed to the time co-ordinate. Every point on 
the moUusk is treated as a space-point, and every 
material point which is at rest relatively to it as 
at rest, so long as the mollusk is considered as 
reference-body. The general principle of rela- 
tivity requires that all these mc^usks can be used 
as reference-bodies with equal right and equal 
success in the formulation of the general laws of 
natxire; the laws themselves must be quite 
independent of the choice of mollusk. 

The great pbwer possessed by the general 
principle of relativity lies in the comprehensive 
limitation which is imposed on the laws of nature 
in consequence of what we have seen above. 



THE SOLUTION OF THE PROBLEM OF GRAVI- 
TATION ON THE BASIS OF THE GENERAL 
PRINCIPLE OF RELATIVITY 

IF the reader has followed all our previous 
considerations, he will have no further diffi- 
culty in understanding the methods leading 
to the solution of the problem of gravitation. 

We start off from a consideration of a Galileian 
domain, i.e. a domain in which there is no gravita- 
tional field relative to the Galileian reference- 
body K. The behaviour of measuring-rods and 
clocks with reference to K is known from the 
special theory of relativity, likewise the behaviour 
of "isolated" material points; the latter move 
uniformly and in straight lines. 

Now let us refer this domain to a random Gauss 
co-ordinate system or to a "mollusk" as reference-' 
body K\ Then with respect to K' there is a, 
gravitational field G (of a particular kind). We 
learn the behaviour of measuring-rods and clocks 
and also of freely-moving material points with 
reference to K' simply by mathematical trans- 
formation. We interpret this behaviour as the 

119 



140 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

behaviour of measuring-rodSi clocks and material 
points under the influence of the gravitational 
field G. Hereupon we introduce a hypothesis: 
that the influence of the gravitational field on 
measuring-rodsy clocks and freely-moving material 
points continues to take place according to the 
same laws, even in the case when the prevailing 
gravitational field is not derivable from the 
Galileian special case, simply by means of a 
transformation of co-ordinates. 

The next step is to investigate the space-time 
behaviour of the gravitational field G, which was 
derived from the Galileian special case simply by 
transformation of the co-ordinates. This be- 
haviour is formulated in a law, which is always 
valid, no matter how the reference-body (moUusk) 
used in the description may be chosen. 

This law is not yet the general law of the gravita- 
tional field, since the gravitational field xmder 
consideration is of a special kind. In order to 
find out the general law-of-field of gravitation we 
stiU require to obtain a generalisation of the law 
as foimd above. This can be obtained without 
caprice, however, by taking into consideration 
the following demands: 

(a) The required generalisation must likewise 

satisfy the general postulate of relativity. 

(b) If there is any matter in the domain under 

consideration, only its inertial mass^ and 



SOLUTION OF GRAVITATION 121 

thxis according to Section XV only its 
energy is of importance for its effect in 
exciting a field. 
(c) Gravitational field and matter together 
must satisfy the law of the conservation 
of energy (and of impulse). 

Finally, the general principle of relativity per- 
mits us to determine the influence of the gravita- 
tional field on the course of all those processes 
which take place according to known laws when a 
gravitational field is absent, i.e. which have 
already been fitted into the frame of the special 
theory of relativity. In this connection we pro- 
ceed in principle according to the method which 
has already been explained for measuring-rods, 
clocks and freely-moving material points. 

The theory of gravitation derived in this way 
from the general postulate of relativity excels 
not only in its beauty; nor in removing the defect 
attaching to classical mechanics which was brought 
to light in Section XXI; nor in interpreting the 
empirical law of the equality of inertial and 
gravitational mass; but it has also already ex- 
plained a result of observation in astronomy, 
against which classical mechanics is powerless. 

If we confine the application of the theory to 
the case where the gravitational fields can be 
regarded as being weak, and in which all masses 
move with respect to the co-ordinate system with 



188 GENERAL THEORY OP RELATIVITY 

velocities which axe small compaxed with the 
velocity of light, we then obtain as a first ap- 
proximation the Newtonian theory. Thus the 
latter theory is obtained here without any particu- 
lar assumption, whereas Newton had to introduce 
the hypothesis that the force of attraction between 
mutually attracting material points is inversely 
proportional to the square of the distance between 
them. If we increase the accuracy of the calcu- 
lation, deviations from the theory of Newton 
make their appearance, practically all of which 
must nevertheless escape the test of observation 
owing to their smallness. 

We must draw attention here to one of these 
deviations. According to Newton's theory, a 
planet moves roimd the sxm in an ellipse, which 
would permanently maintain its position with 
respect to the fixed stars, if we could disregard 
the motion of the fixed stars themselves and the 
action of the other planets imder consideration. 
Thus, if we correct the observed motion of the 
planets for these two influences, and if Newton's 
theory be strictly correct, we ought to obtain 
for the orbit of the planet an ellipse, which is 
fixed with reference to the fixed stars. This 
deduction, which can be tested with great ac- 
curacy, has been confirmed for all the planets 
save one, with the precision that is capable of 
being obtained by the delicacy of observation 



SOLUTION OF GRAVITATION 12S 

attainable at the present time. The sole ex- 
ception is Mercury, the planet which lies nearest 
the stin. SiQce the time of Leverrier, it has been 
known that the ellipse corresponding to the orbit 
of Mercury, after it has been corrected for the 
influences mentioned above, is not stationary with 
respect to the fixed stars, but that it rotates ex- 
ceedingly slowly in the plane of the orbit and in 
the sense of the orbital motion. The value ob- 
tained for this rotary movement of the orbital 
ellipse was 43 seconds of arc per centxuy, an 
amount ensured to be correct to within a few 
seconds of arc. This effect can be explained by 
means of classical mechanics only on the as- 
sumption of hypotheses which have little proba- 
bility, and which were devised solely for this 
purpose. 

On the basis of the general theory of relativity, 
it is f oimd that the ellipse of every planet round 
the sun must necessarily rotate in the manner 
indicated above; that for all the planets, with 
the exception of Mercury, this rotation is too 
small to be detected with the delicacy of ob- 
servation possible at the present time; but that 
in the case of Mercury it must amount to 43 
seconds of arc per century, a result which is strictly 
in agreement with observation. 

Apart from this one, it has hitherto been possible 
to make only two deductions from the theory 



124 GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

which admit of being tested by observation, to wit, 
the curvature of light rays by the gravitational 
field of the sun/ and a displacement of the spectral 
lines of light reaching us from large stars, as com- 
pared with the corresponding lines for Ught pro- 
duced in an analogous manner terrestrially {i.e. 
by the same kind of molecule). I do not doubt 
that these deductions from the theory will be 
confirmed also. 

^ Obfierved by Eddington and others in 1919. (Cf. Appendix 

in.) 



PART III 

CONSIDERATIONS ON THE UNIVERSE 

AS A WHOLE 

XXX 

COSMOLOGICAL DIFFICULTIES OF NEWTON'S 

THEORY 

APART from the difficulty discussed in Sec- 
tion XXI, there is a second fundamental 
difficulty attending classical celestial me- 
chanics, which, to the best of my knowledge, 
was first discussed in detail by the astronomer 
Seeliger. If we ponder over the question as to 
how the universe, considered as a whole, is to be 
regarded, the first answer that suggests itself to 
us is surely this: As regards space (and time) 
the universe is infinite. There are stars every- 
where, so that the density of matter, although 
very variable in detail, is nevertheless on the 
average everywhere the same. In other words: 
However far we might travel through space, we 
should find everjrwhere an attenuated swarm of 
fixed stars of approximately the same kind and 
density, 

li5 



1«6 CONSIDERATIONS ON THE UNIVERSE 

This view is not in harmony with the theory of 
Newton. The latter theory rather requires that 
the universe should have a kind of centre in which 
the density of the staxs is a maximum, and that 
as we proceed outwards from this centre the 
group-density of the stars should diminish, imtil 
finally, at great distances, it is succeeded by an 
infinite region of emptiness. The stellar universe 
ought to be a finite island in the infinite ocean of 
space.* 

This conception is in itself not very satisfactory. 
It is still less satisfactory because it leads to the 
result that the light emitted by the stars and also 
individual stars of the stellar system are per- 
petually passing out into infinite space, never 
to retiun, and without ever again coming into 
interaction with other objects of nature. Such 
a finite material universe would be destined 
to become gradually but systematically impov- 
erished. 

* Proof. — According to the theory of Newton, the number of 
''lines of force" which come from infinity and terminate in a mass 
m is proportional to the mass m. If, on the average, the mass-den- 
sity pio is constant throughout the universe, then a sphere of volume 
V will enclose the average mass poF. Thus the number of lines of 
force passing through the surface F of the sphere into its interior is 
proportional to poF. For unit area of the surface of the sphere the 
number of lines of force which enters the sphere is thus proportional 

to p^-pottop^. Hence the intensity of the field at the surface would 

tdtimatdy become infinite with increasing radius R of the sphere, 
which is impossible. 



NEWTON'S THEORY 1£7 

In order to escape this dilemma, Seeliger sug- 
gested a modification of Newton's law, in whidi 
he assumes that for great distances the force of 
attraction between two masses diminishes more 
rapidly than would result from the inverse square 
law. In this way it is possible for the mean 
density of matter to be constant ever3rwhere, even 
to infinity, without infinitely large gravitational 
fields being produced. We thus free ourselves 
from the distasteful conception that the material 
imiverse ought to possess something of the nature 
of a centre. Of course we purchase our emancipa- 
tion from the fundamental difficulties mentioned, 
at the cost of a modification and complication of 
Newton's law which has neither empirical nor 
theoretical foundation. We can imagine innum- 
erable laws which would serve the same purpose, 
without our being able to state a reason why one 
of them is to be preferred to the others; for any 
one of these laws would be foimded just as little 
on more general theoretical principles as is the 
law of Newton. 



THE POSSIBILITY OF A "FINITE" AND YET 
"UNBOUNDED" UNIVERSE 

BUT speculations on the structure of the 
universe also move in quite another direc- 
tion. The development of non-Euclidean 
geometry led to the recognition of the fact, 
that we can cast doubt on the infiniteness of 
our space without coming into conflict with the 
laws of thought or with experience (Riemann, 
Helmholtz). These questions have already been 
treated in detail and with imsuipassable lucidity 
by Helmholtz and Poincar6, whereas I can only 
touch on them briefly here. 

In the first place, we imagine an existence in 
two-dimensional space. Flat beings with flat 
implements, and in particular flat rigid measuring- 
rods, are free to move in a plane. For them 
nothing exists outside of this plane: that which 
they observe to happen to themselves and to their 
flat "things" is the all-inclusive reality of their 
plane. In particular, the constructions of plane 
Euclidean geometry can be carried out by means 
of the rods, e.g. the lattice construction, con- 

128 



UNIVERSE— FINITE YET UNBOUNDED l«ft 

sidered in Section XXTV. In contrast to ours, 
the universe of these beings is two-dimensional; 
but, like ours, it extends to infinity. In their 
universe there is room for an infinite number of 
identical squares made up of rods, i.e. its volume 
(surface) is infinite. If these beings say their 
universe is "plane," there is sense in the state- 
ment, because they mean that they can perform 
the constructions of plane Euclidean geometry 
with their rods. In this connection the indi- 
vidual rods always represent the same distance, 
independently of their position. 

Let us consider now a second two-dimensional 
existence, but this time on a spherical surface 
instead of on a plane. The flat beings with their 
measuring-rods and other objects fit exactly on 
this surface and they are imable to leave it. Their 
whole tmiverse of observation extends exclusively 
over the surface of the sphere. Are these beings 
able to regard the geometry of their imiverse as 
being plane geometry and their rods withal as 
the realisation of "distance"? They cannot do 
this. For if they attempt to realise a straight 
line, they will obtain a curve, which we "three- 
dimensional beings" designate as a great circle, 
i.e. a self-contaiaed line of definite finite length, 
which can be measured up by means of a measur- 
ing-rod. Similarly, this universe has a finite 
area, that can be compared with the area of a 



ISO CONSIDERATIONS ON THE UNIVERSE 

square constructed with rods. The great charm 
resultmg from this consideration lies in the 
recognition of the fact that the universe of these 
beings is finite and yet has no limits. 

But the spherical-surface beings do not need 
to go on a world-toiu: in order to perceive that they 
are not living in a Euclidean imiverse. They can 
convince themselves of this on every part of their 
^Vorld/' provided they do not use too small a 
piece of it. Starting from a point, they draw 
'^straight lines" (arcs of circles as judged in 
three-dimensional space) of equal length in all 
directions. They will call the line joining the 
free ends of these lines a "circle." For a plane 
surface, the ratio of the circumference of a circle 
to its diameter, both lengths being measured with 
the same rod, is, according to Euclidean geometry 
of the plane, equal to a constant value tt, which is 
independent of the diameter of the circle. On 
their spherical surface our flat beings would find 
for this ratio the value 



sin 



W 



i.e. a smaller value than t, the difference being 
the more considerable, the greater is the radius 
of the circle in comparison with the radius R of 
the "world-sphere." By means of this relation 



UNIVERSE— FINITE YET UNBOUNDED 181 

the spherical beings can determine the radius of 
their universe ("world")? even when only a 
relatively small part of their world-sphere is 
available for their measurements. But if this' 
part is very small indeed, they will no longer be 
able to demonstrate that they are on a spherical 
"world" and not on a Euclidean plane, for a 
small part of a spherical surface differs only slightly 
from a piece of a plane of the same size. 

Thus if the spherical-surface beings are living 
on a planet of which the solar system occupies 
only a negligibly small part of the spherical 
universe, they have no means of determining 
whether they are living in a finite or in an infinite 
imiverse, because the "piece of imiverse" to 
which they have access is in both cases prac- 
tically plane, or Euclidean. It follows directly 
from this discussion, that for our sphere-beings 
the circumference of a circle first increases with 
the radius imtil the "circumference of the uni- 
verse" is reached, and that it thenceforward 
gradually decreases to zero for still further in- 
creasing values of the radius. During this process 
the area of the circle continues to increase more 
and more, imtil finally it becomes equal to the 
total area of the whole "world-sphere." 

Perhaps the reader will wonder why we have 
placed our "beings" on a sphere rather than on 
another closed surface. But this choice has its 



182 CONSIDEBATIONS ON THE UNIVERSE 

justification in the fact that, of all closed sur- 
faces, the sphere is unique in possessing the 
property that all pomts on it are eqtiivalent. I 
admit that the ratio of the circumference c of a 
circle to its raditis r depends on r , but for a given 
value of f it is the same for all points of the 
"world-sphere"; in other words, the "world- 
sphere" is a "surface of constant curvature." 

To this two-dimensional sphere-imiverse there 
is a three-dimensional analogy, namely, the 
three-dimensional spherical space which was dis- 
covered by Riemann. Its points are likewise all 
equivalent. It possesses a finite volmne, which 
is determined by its "radius" (2ir*l?). Is it pos- 
sible to imagine a spherical space? To imagine 
a space means nothing else than that we imagine 
an q)itome of our "space" experience, i.e. of 
experience that we can have in the movement of 
"rigid" bodies. In this sense we can imagine 
a spherical space. 

Suppose we draw lines or stretch strings in all 
directions from a point, and mark off from each 
of these the distance r with a measuring-rod. 
All the free end-points of these lengths lie on a 
spherical surface. We can specially measure up 
the area (F) of this surface by means of a square 
made up of measuring-rods. If the imiverse is 
Euclidean, then F= 4irf*; if it is spherical, then 
F is always less than 4irf '. With increasing values 



UNIVERSE— PINITE YET UNBOUNDED 133 

of fj F increases from zero up to a maxinitim value 
which is determined by the "world-radius," but 
for still further increasing values of r , the area 
gradually diminishes to zero. At first, the straight 
lines which radiate from the starting point diverge 
farther and farther from one another, but later 
they approach each other, and finally they nm 
together again at a "counter-point" to the start- 
ing point. Under such conditions they have 
traversed the whole spherical space. It is easily 
seen that the three-dimensional spherical space 
is quite analogous to the two-dimensional spherical 
surface. It is finite {i.e. of finite volmne), and 
has no bounds. 

It may be mentioned that there is yet another 
kind of curved space: "elliptical space." It can 
be regarded as a curved space in which the two 
"coimter-points" are identical (indistinguishable 
from each other). An elliptical universe can thus 
be considered to some extent as a curved imiverse 
possessing central symmetry. 

It follows from what has been said, that closed 
spaces without limits are conceivable. From 
amongst these, the spherical space (and the el- 
liptical) excels in its simplicity, since all points on 
it are equivalent. As a result of this discussion, 
a most interesting question arises for astronomers 
and ph3rsicists, and that is whether the universe 
in which we live is infinite, or whether it is finite 



1S4 CONSIDERATIONS ON THE UNIVERSE 

in the manner of the spherical universe. Our ex* 
perience is far from being sufficient to enable us 
to answer this question. But the general theory 
of relativity permits of our answering it with a 
moderate degree of certainty, and in this con- 
nection the difficulty mentioned in Section XXX 
finds its solution. 



THE STRUCTXJRE OF SPACE ACCORDING TO 
THE GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

ACCORDING to the general theory of 
relativity, the geometrical properties of 
space are not independent, but they axe 
determined by matter. Thus we can draw con- 
clusions about the geometrical structure of the 
universe only if we base oiu: considerations on 
the state of the matter as being something that 
is known. We know from experience that, for a 
suitably chosen co-ordinate system, the velocities 
of the stars are small as compared with the 
velocity of transmission of light. We can thus 
as a rough approximation arrive at a conclusion 
as to the nature of the imiverse as a whole, if 
we treat the matter as being at rest. 

We already know from our previous discussion 
that the behaviour of measuring-rods and clocks 
is influenced by gravitational fields, i.e. by the 
distribution of matter. This in itself is sufficient 
to exclude the possibility of the exact validity of 
Euclidean geometry in our universe. But it is 
conceivable that our universe differs only slightly 

185 



186 CONSIDERATIONS ON THE UNIVERSE 

from a Euclidean one, and this notion seems all 
the more probable, since calculations show that 
the metrics of surrounding space is influenced 
only to an exceedingly small extent by masses 
even of the magnitude of oiu: sun. We might 
imagine that, as r^ards geometry, our universe 
behaves analogously to a siurface which is ir- 
regularly curved in its individual parts, but which 
nowhere departs appreciably from a plane: some- 
thing like the rippled surface of a lake. Such a 
imiverse might fittingly be called a quasi-Eu- 
clidean universe. As regards its space it would 
be infinite. But calculation shows that in a 
quasi-Eudidean universe the average density of 
matter would necessarily be nil. Thus such a 
imiverse could not be inhabited by matter every- 
where; it would present to us that unsatisfactory 
picture which we portrayed in Section XXX. 

If we are to have in the imiverse an average 
density of matter which differs from zero, how- 
ever small may be that difference, then the 
universe cannot be quasi-Euclidean. On the con- 
trary, the results of calculation indicate that if 
matter be distributed imiformly, the universe 
would necessarily be spherical (or elliptical). 
Since in reality the detailed distribution of matter 
is not uniform, the real universe will deviate in 
individual parts from the spherical, i.e. the uni- 
verse will be quasi-spherical. But it will be 



THE STRUCTURE OF SPACE 137 

necessarily finite. In fact, the theory supplies 
us with a simple connection * between the space- 
expanse of the universe and the average density 
of matter in it. 

^ For the "radius" R of the universe we obtain the equation 

IP- — 

2 

The use of the C.G.S. system in this equation gives - « i*oS.io^; 

ft 

p is the averagie density of the matter. 



APPENDIX I 

SIMPLE DERIVATION OF THE LORENTZ 
TRANSFORMATION [Supplementary to Sec- 
tion XQ 

FOR the relative orientation of the co-ordi- 
nate systems indicated in Fig. 2, the 
x-axes of both systems permanentiy co- 
incide. In the present case we can divide the 
problem into parts by considering first only 
events which are localised on the x-axis. Any 
such event is represented with respect to the co- 
ordinate system K by the abscissa x and the 
time /, and with respect to the system K^ by the 
abscissa x^ and the time f. We require to find 
x^ and f when x and / are given. 

A light-signal, which is proceeding along the 
positive axis of x, is transmitted according to the 
equation 

or 

x-d-o (i). 

Since the same light-signal has to be transmitted 
relative to K^ with the velocity c, the propagation 

189 



140 APPENDIX I 

relative to the system K' will be represented by 
the analogous formula 

a/-c^-o (2). 

Those space-time points (events) which satisfy 
(i) must also satisfy (2). Obviously this will be 
the case when the relation 

(x'-cO-X(«-^0 (3) 

is fulfilled in general, where X indicates a con- 
stant; for, according to (3), the disappearance 
of {x — ci) involves the disappearance of («' — cf). 
If we apply quite similar considerations to light 
rays which are being transmitted along the 
negative x-axis, we obtain the condition 

(a/ + cO =/i(« + ^0 (4). 

By adding (or subtracting) equations (3) and (4), 
and introducing for convenience the constants a 
and h in place of the constants X and /a where 

2 

we obtain the equations 

cf ^ad-bx] ^S;- 

We should thus have the solution of our prob- 
lem, if the constants a and h were known. These 
result from the following discussion. 

For the origin of K' we have permanently 
x' » o, and hence according to the first of the 
equations (5) 



THE LORENTZ TEIANSFOBMATION 141 

a 

* 

If we call V the velocity with which the origin 
of K^ is moving relative to Ky we then have 

I v^ - (6). 

The same value v can be obtained from equa- 
tion (5), if we calculate the velocity of another 
point of K^ relative to Kj or the velocity (di- 
rected towards the negative «-axis) of a point of 
K with respect to K\ In short, we can designate 
V as the relative velocity of the two systems. 

Furthermore, the principle of relativity teadies 

us that, as judged from Ky the length of a unit 

I measuring-rod which is at rest with reference to 

K^ must be exactly the same as the length, as 
judged from K\ of a imit measuring-rod which 
is at rest relative to K. In order to see how the 

I 

points of the x'-axis appear as viewed from Ky 

we only require to take a "snapshot" of K^ from 

K'y this means that we have to insert a particular 

I value of t (time of K)y e.g. / = o. For this value of 

I /we then obtain from the first of the equations (5) 

x^ ^ ax. 

Two points of the oZ-axis which are separated 
by the distance A a?' = i when measured in the 
K^ system are thus separated in our instantaneous 
photograph by the distance 

^^i (7). 



Itf 



APPENDIX I 



But if tbe snapshot be taken from K^(fmo\ 
and if we eliminate t from the equations (5)1 
taking into account the e]q;>ression (6), we 
obtain 

From this we conclude that two points on the 
X-axis and separated by the distance i (relative to 
K) will be represented on our snapshot by the 
distance 

But from what has been said, the two snap- 
shots must be identical; hence Ar in (7) must 
be equal to ^ in (ya), so that we obtain 



a*- 



(7*). 



^-? 



The equations (6) and (7^) determine the con- 
stants a and b. By inserting the values of these 
constants in (5), we obtain the first and the 
fourth of the equations given in Section XL 

X — vt 



V- 



H^ 






yf-l. 



(8). 



THE LOHENTZ. TRANSFORMATION 143 

Thus we have obtained the Lorentz trans- 
formation for events on the x^asds. It satisfies 

the condition 

x'«-A'«-rc«-c«? (8a). 

The extension of this result, to include events 
which take place outside the x-asisy is obtained by 
retaining equations (8) and supplementing them 
by the relations 

ill) (')• 

In this way we satisfy the postulate of the con- 
stancy of the velocity of light in vactw for rays 
of light of arbitrary direction, both for the system 
K and for the system K\ This may be shown in 
the following manner. 

We suppose a light-signal sent out from the 
origin of K at the time /so. It will be propa- 
gated according to the equation 

f - V^ + f + ^^ct, 

or, if we square this equation, according to the 

equation 

^ + ^ + ^-^ ^o (lo). 

It is required by the law of propagation of light, 
in conjimction with the postulate of relativity, 
that the transmission of the signal in question 
should take place — as judged from K^ — in 
accordance with the corresponding formula 

or, 

a^ + y^ + «^-A^-o .... (lotf). 



144 APPENDIX I 

In order that equation (loa) may be a consequence 
of equation (lo), we must have 

.jr^ + y^ + s^-cV^-o-Oi^ + y + J^-c?^ (ii). 

Since equation (8a) must hold for points on the 
x-ans, we thus have cr » i. It is easily seen 
that the Lorentz transformation really satisfies 
equation (ii) for <r= i; for (ii) is a consequence 
of (8a) and (9), and hence also of (8) and (9). 
We have thus derived the Lorentz transformation. 

The Lorentz transformation represented by 
(8) and (9) still requires to be generalised. Ob- 
viously it is immaterial whether the axes of K' 
be chosen so that they are spatially parallel to 
those of K. It is also not essential that the 
velocity of translation of K' with respect to K 
should be in the direction of the x-axis. A simple 
consideration shows that we are able to construct 
the Lorentz transformation in this general sense 
from two kinds of transformations, viz. from 
Lorentz transformations in the special sense and 
from purely spatial transformations, which cor- 
responds to the replacement of the rectangular 
co-ordinate system by a new S5^tem with its 
axes pointing in other directions. 

Mathematically, we can characterise the gen- 
eralised Lorentz transformation thus: 

It expresses x', y', /, f^ in terms of linear 
homogeneous functions of x, y, 2, ^, of such a kind 
that the relation 



THE LORENTZ TRANSFORMATION 145 

«'' + y'* + 2^ - c*!'^ - a? + y* + a? - £?^ . (iia) 

is satisfied identically. That is to say: If we 
substitute their expressions in Xy y, 0, <, in place of 
^\ y\ 2', iy on the left-hand side, then the left- 
hand side of (iia) agrees with the right-hand side. 



APPENDIX II 

MINKOWSKI'S FOUR— DIMENSIONAL SPACE 

C'WORLD'O [SUFPLEMEMTAKY TO SeCHON XVn] 

TTTE can cfaaiacterise the Lorentz tians- 

W f onnation still more si mply if we in* 

troduce the imaginary V — i. d in place 

of ty as time-variable. If, in accordance with 

thiS| we insert 

x%^y 
*• "■ * _ 

and similarly for the accented S3rstem K\ then the 
condition which is identically satisfied by the 
transformation can be expressed thus: 

xi'^ + «5i'* + xt^ + «*'* ^x^ + xf + xf + xf. (12). 

That is, by the afore-mentioned choice of ^^co- 
ordinates " (iia) is transformed into this equation. 

We see from (12) that the imaginary time co- 
ordinate Xi enters into the condition of trans- 
formation in exactly the same way as the space 
co-ordinates Xi, %, Xt. It is due to this fact that, 
according to the theory of relativity, the ^'time'' 

146 



FOUB-DIMENSIONAL SPACE 147 

Xi enteis into natural laws in the same form as 
the space co-ordinates Xu X2f Xt. 

A four-dimensional continuum described by the 
^'co-ordinates'' Xu x%y Xn^ x^y was called ''world" 
by Minkowski, who also termed a point-event a 
"world-point." From a "happening" in three- 
dimensional space, physics becomes, as it were, 
an "existence" in the four-dimensional "world." 

This four-dimensional "world" bears a dose 
similarity to the three-dimensional "space" of 
(Euclidean) analytical geometry. K we intro- 
duce into the latter a new Cartesian co-ordinate 
s}rstem (x'l, o/s, xfi) with the same origin, then 
xf\j x^%j o/s, are linear homogeneous functions of 
Xxy x%y Xiy which identically satisfy the equation 

xi'^'\'X%'^ + xz'^^xf + xf + x^.  

The analogy with (12) is a complete one. We 
can regard Minkowski's "world" in a formal 
manner as a f omr-dimensional Euclidean space 
(with ima^nary time co-ordinate); the Lorentz 
transformation corresponds to a "rotation" of 
the co-ordinate system in the four-dimensional 
"world-" 



APPENDIX III 

THE EXPERIMENTAL CONFIRMATION OF THE 
GENERAL THEORY OF RELATIVITY 

FROM a systematic theoretical point of 
view, we may imagine the process of 
evolution of an empirical science to be a 
continuous process of induction. Theories are 
evolved, and are expressed in short compass as 
statements of a large nimiber of individual ob- 
servations in the form of empirical laws, from 
which the general laws can be ascertained by 
comparison. Regarded in this way, the develop- 
ment of a science bears some resemblance to the 
compilation of a dassi&ed catalogue. It is, as 
it were, a purely empirical enterprise. 

But this point of view by no means embraces 
the whole of the actual process; for it slurs over 
the important part played by intuition and 
deductive thought in the development of an 
exact science. As soon as a science has emerged 
from its initial stages, theoretical advances are 
no longer achieved merely by a process of arrange- 
ment. Guided by empirical data, the investigator 
rather develops a system of thought which, in 

148 



EXPEBBIENTAL CONFIRMATION 149 

generali is built up logically from a small number 
of fimdamental assumptionsi the so-called axioms. 
We call such a system of thought a theory. The 
theory finds the justification for its eidstence in 
the fact that it correlates a large number of single 
observations, and it is just here that the "truth" 
of the theory lies. 

Corresponding to the same complex of empirical 
data, there may be several theories, which difiEer 
from one another to a considerable extent. But 
as regards the deductions from the theories which 
are capable of being tested, the agreement be- 
tween the theories may be so complete, that it 
becomes dif&cult to find such deductions in which 
the two theories differ from each other. As an 
example, a case of general interest is available in 
the province of biology, in the Darwinian theory 
of the development of species by selection in 
the struggle for existence, and in the theory of 
development which is based on the hypothesis 
of the hereditary transmission of acquired char- 
acters. 

We have another instance of far-reaching 
agreement between the deductions from two 
theories in Newtonian mechanics on the one hand, 
and the general theory of relativity on the other. 
This agreement goes so far, that up to the present 
we have been able to find only a few deductions 
from the general theory of relativity which are 



150 APPENDIX m 

capable of investigation, and to which the physics 
of pre-relativity days does not also lead, and 
this despite the profound difference in the funda- 
mental assumptions of the two theories. In 
what follows, we shall again consider these im- 
portant deductions, and we shall also discuss 
the empirical evidence appertaining to them 
which has hitherto been obtained. 



(a) Motion of the Pkrthktjon of Mercury 

According to Newtonian mechanics and New- 
ton's law of gravitation, a planet which is revolving 
round the sim would describe an ellipse round the 
latter, or, more correctly, round the common 
centre of gravity of the sun and the planet. In 
such a system, the sun, or the common centre of 
gravity, lies in one of the f od of the orbital ellipse 
in such a manner that, in the course of a planet- 
year, the distance sun-planet grows from a mini- 
mum to a maximum, and then decreases again 
to a minimum. If instead of Newton's law we 
insert a somewhat different law of attraction into 
the calculation, we find that, according to this 
new law, the motion would still take place in such 
a manner that the distance sun-planet exhibits 
periodic variations; but in this case the angle 
described by the line joining sun and planet 
during such a period (from perihelion — closest 



EXFEBBIENTAL CONFIBMATION 151 

proximity to the sun — to perihelion) would 
differ from 36o^ The line of the orbit would not 
then be a closed one, but in the coiurse of time 
it would fill up an annular part of the orbital 
plane, viz. between the circle of least and the 
circle of greatest distance of the planet from 
the Sim. 

According also to the general theory of relativity, 
which differs of course from the theory of Newton, 
a small variation from the Newton-Kepler mo- 
tion of a planet in its orbit should take place, and 
in such a way, that the angle described by the 
radius sim-planet between one perihelion and the 
next ishould exceed that corresponding to one 
complete revolution by an amomit given by 



(N.B. — One complete revolution corresponds 
to the angle 2 ir in the absolute angular measure 
customary in physics, and the above expression 
gives the amount by which the radius sun-planet 
exceeds this angle during the interval between 
one perihelion and the next.) In this expression 
a represents the major semi-axis of the ellipse, 
e its eccentricity, c the velocity of light, and T 
the period of revolution of the planet. Our 
result may also be stated as follows: According 
to the general theory of relativity, the major axis 
of the ellipse rotates round the sun in the same 



15« APPENDIX m 

sense as the orbital motion of the planet. Theory 
reqtiires that this rotation should amotmt to 43 
seconds of arc per century for the planet Mercury, 
but for the other planets of our solar system its 
magnitude should be so small that it would 
necessarily escape detection.^ 

In point of fact, astronomers have found that 
the theory of Newton does not suflBlce to cal- 
culate the observed motion of Mercury with an 
exactness corresponding to that of the delicacy 
of observation attainable at the present time. 
After taking account of all the disturbing in- 
flu^ices exerted on Mercury by the remaining 
planets, it was found (Leverrier — 1859 — and 
Newcomb — 1895) that an unexplained perihelial 
movement of the orbit of Mercury remained over, 
the amount of which does not differ sensibly from 
the above-mentioned + 43 seconds of arc per 
century. The uncertainty of the empirical result 
amounts to a few seconds only. 

Q>) Deflectxcn of Light by a 
Gravitational Fjeld 

In Section XXII it has beeai already mentioned 
that, according to the general theory of relativity, 
a ray of light will experience a curvature of its 

^ Especially since the next planet Venus has an orbit that is 
almost an exact circle, which makes it more difficult to locate the 
perihelion with precision. 



EXPEREVIENTAL CONFIRMATION 153 

path when passing through a gravitational field, 
this curvature being similar to that experienced 
by the path of a body which is projected through 
a gravitational field. As a result of this theory, 
we should expect that a ray of light which is 
passing close to a heavenly body would be deviated 
towards the latter. For a ray of light which 
passes the sim at a distance of A sim-radii from 
its centre, the angle of deflection (a) should 
amount to 

I • 7 seconds of arc 



a « 



A 



It may be added that, according to the theory, 
half of this deflection is produced by the New- 
tonian field of attraction of the 
sim, and the other half by the j 

geometrical modification (* * curva- / y 

ture ") of space caused by the sun. / 

This result admits of an experi- / / 

mental test by means of the ^^1 
photographic registration of stars 7/ 
during a total eclipse of the sim. ^f/o^^ 
The only reason why we must ^ 
wait for a total eclipse is because ^ 
at every other time the atmos- pj^ ^ 

phere is so strongly illmninated 
by the light from the sun that the stars situated 
near the sim's disc are invisible. The predicted 
effect can be seen clearly from the accompanying 



154 APPENDIX m 

diagram* If the sun (5) were not present, a star 
which is practically infinitely distant would be 
seen in the direction A» as observed from the 
earth. But as a consequence of the deflection of 
light from the star by the sun, the star will be 
seen in the direction A> i>e. at a somewhat greater 
distance from the centre of the sun than corre- 
sponds to its real position. 

In practice, the question is tested in the fol* 
lowing way. The stars in the nei^bourhood of 
the sun are photographed during a solar edipse. 

In addition, a second photograph of the same 
stars is taken when the sun is situated at another 
position in the sky, i.e. a few months earlier or 
later. As compared with the standard photograph, 
the positions of the stars on the edipse-photograph 
ought to appear displaced radially outwards 
(away from the centre of the sun) by an amount 
corresponding to the angle a. 

We are indebted to the Royal Sodety and to 
the Royal Astronomical Sodety for the investiga- 
tion of this important deduction. Undaunted 
by the war and by difficulties of both a material 
and a psydiological nature aroused by the war, 
these sodeties equipped two expeditions — to 
Sobral (Brazil) and to the island of Prindpe 
(West Africa) — and sent several of Britain's 
most celebrated astronomers (Eddington, Cotting- 
ham, Crommelin, Davidson), in order to obtain 



I EXPERIMENTAL CONFIRMATION 155 



photographs of the solar eclipse of 29th May, 
1919. The relative discrepancies to be expected 
between the stellar photographs obtained during 
the eclipse and the comparison photographs 
amounted to a few himdredths of a millimetre 
only. Thus great accuracy was necessary in 
making the adjustments reqtiired for the taking 
of the photographs, and in then: subsequent 
measurement. 

The results of the measurements confirmed the 
theory in a thoroughly satisfactory manner. The 
rectangular components of the observed and of 
the calculated deviations of the stars (in seconds 
of arc) are set forth in the following table of 
results: 



Number of the 


First Co-ordinate. 


Second Co-ordinate. 

- 


Star. 


Observed. Calculated. Observed. Calculated. 


II 


— O'lQ 


— o«22 


+ 0«l6 +0«02 


5 . 


+ 0*29 


+ 0-31 


- 0-46 - 0-43 


4 


+ 0'II 


-fO'IO 


+ 0-83 +0-74 


3 • 


+ o«2Q 


+ 0-I2 


+ i«cx> +0-87 


6 . , 


+ 0-I0 


+ 0;04 


+ 0-S7 +0-40 


10 


-o-o8 


+ 0-09 


+ 0-3S +0-32 


2 


+ 0-95 


+ 0-85 


— 0-27 — 0*09 



(c) Displacement of Spectral Lines 

TOWARDS THE ReD 

In Section XXlil it has been shown that in a 
system K^ which is in rotation with regard to a 
Galileian system Kj clocks of identical construe- 



156 APPENDIX m 

tion, and which are considered at rest with re^)ect 
to the rotating reference-body, go at rates which 
are dependent on the positions of the docks. We 
shall now examine this dependence quantitatively. 
A dock, which is situated at a distance r from the 
centre of the disc, has a velodty relative to K 
which is given by 

V-COf, 

where <» represents the angular vdodty of rotation 
of the disc ^' with respect to IT. If vq represents the 
number of ticks of the dock per unit time ("rate" 
of the dock) relative to K when the dock is at 
rest, then the "rate" of the dock (i') when it is 
moving relative to K with a velocity r, but at rest 
with respect to the disc, will, in accordance with 
Section Xn, be given by 

or mth suffident accuracy by 

This expresdon may also be stated in the fol- 
lowing form: 

If we represent the difference of potential of the 
centrifugal force between the position of the dock 
and the centre of the disc by ^, i.e. the work, 



EXPERIMENTAL CONFIRMATION 167 

considered negatively, which must be performed 
on the unit of mass against the centrifugal force 
in order to transport it from the position of the 
dock on the rotating disc to the centre of the disc, 
then we have 

From this it follows that 

In the first place, we see from this expression that 
two clocks of identical construction will go at 
different rates when situated at different distances 
from the centre of the disc. This resxilt is also 
valid from the standpoint of an observer who is 
rotating with the disc. 

Now, as judged from the disc, the latter is in a 
gravitational field of potential ^, hence the result 
we have obtained will hold quite generally for 
gravitational fields. Furthermore, we can regard 
an atom which is emitting spectral lines as a 
clock, so that the following statement will 
hold: 

An atom absorbs or emits light cf a frequency 
which is dependent on the potential cf the gravita- 
tional field in which it is situated. 

The frequency of an atom situated on the 
surface of a heavenly body will be somewhat 
less than the frequency of an atom of the same 



158 APPENDIX m 

element which is situated in free spax:e (or on the 
surface of a smaller celestial body). 

Now - - Kr^j where K is Newton^s constant of 

gravitation, and Jf is the mass of the heavenly 
body. Thus a displacement towards the red ought 
to take place for spectral lines produced at the 
surface of stars as compared with the spectral lines 
of the same element produced at the surface of 
the earth, the amount of this displacement being 

Po-v KM 
Pq <? r 

For the sun, the displacement towards the red 
predicted by theory amoimts to about two mil- 
lionths of the* wave-length. A trustworthy cal- 
culation is not possible in the case of the stars, 
because in general neither the mass M nor the 
radius r is known. 

It is an open question whether or not this effect 
exists, and at the present time astronomers are 
working with great zeal towards the solution. 
Owing to the smallness of the effect in the case of 
the sun, it is difficult to form an opinion as to its 
existence. Whereas Grebe and Bachem (Bonn), 
as a result of their own measurements and those 
of Evershed and Schwarzschild on the cyanogen 
bands, have placed the existence of the effect 
almost beyond doubt, other investigators, par- 



EXFEBIMENTAL CONFIRMATION 150 

ticularly St. John, have been led to the opposite 
opinion in consequence of their measiurements. 

Mean displacements of lines towards the less 
refrangible end of the spectrum are certainly 
revealed by statistical investigations of the fixed 
stars; but up to the present the examination of 
the available data does not allow of any definite 
decision being arrived at, as to whether or not 
these displacements are to be referred in reality 
to the effect of gravitation. The results of ob- 
servation have been collected together, and dis- 
cussed in detail from the standpoint of the ques- 
tion which has been engaging oiu: attention here, 
in a paper by E. Freimdlich entitled "Zur Priifung 
der allgemeinen Relativitats-Theorie" {Die No 
Pimmsenschaften^ 1919, No. 35, p. 520: Julius 
Springer, Berlin). 

At all events, a definite decision will be readied 
during the next few years. K the displacement 
of spectral lines towards the red by the gravita- 
tional potential does not exist, then the general 
theory of relativity will be untenable. On the 
other hand, if the cause of the displacement of 
spectral lines be definitely traced to the gravita- 
tional potential, then the study of this displace- 
ment will furnish us with important information 
as to the mass of the heavenly bodies. 



BIBLIOGRAPHY 

WORKS IN ENGLISH ON EINSTEIN'S 

THEORY 

ImSODUCIORY 

The FoundaUons of Einstein's Theory of GravitaHon: Erwin Fteund- 
lich (translation by H. L. Brose). Camb. Univ. Press, 1920. 

Space and Time in Contemporary Physics: Moritz Schlick (trans- 
lation by H. L. Brose). Clarendon Press, Oxford, 1920. 

Thb Special Theory 

The Principle cf Relativity: E. Cunningham. Camb. Univ. Press. 

Relativity and the Electron Theory: £. Cunningham, Monographs on 
Physics. Longmans, Green & Co. 

The Theory of RdaHvity: L. Silbeistein. Macmillan & Co. 

The Space-Time Manifold of Relativity: £. B. Wilson and G. N. 
Lewis, Proc, Amer. Soc. Arts d* Science, vol. zlviii., No. xi, 1912. 

The Genesal Theory 

Report on ike RdaHoity Theory of GravitaHon: A. S. Eddington. 
Fleetway Press Ltd., Fleet Street, London. 

On Einstein's Theory of Gravitation and its Astronomical Consequences: 
W. de Sitter, M. N, Roy. Astron. Soc., Izxvi. p. 699, 1916; bczvii. 
?• ^SSf 1916; bnviii. p. 3, 1917. 

On Einstein's Theory of Gravitation: H. A. Lorentz, Proc. Amsterdam 
Acad., vol. xiz. p. 1341, 191 7. 

Space, Time and Gravitation: W. de Sitter: The Observatory, No. 505, 
p. 413. Taylor & Francis, Fleet Street, London. 

161 



102 BIBLIOGRAFHY 

Tie TakA EMfteefsg^ May igig, and the Inflimce of GrarikOUm 
on Idi/U: A. S. Eddington, ibid., March, 1919. 

Discussion on tie Theory of RdaUoUyi M. N. Roy. Askon. Soc.^ voL 
Izxz., No. 2., p. 96, December 19x9. 

The DisiiacemetU of Spectrum Lines and the Equivalence Hypothesis: 
W. G. Duffield, if. N. Roy. Astron, Soc,, vol. Izzz.; No. 3, p. 363, 
Z920. 

Spau, Time and Graioitaiion: A. S. Eddington. Camb. Univ. Preat, 
2920. 

AlsOi Chapiexs m 

The MathemaHcal Theory of EledricUy and MagueUsm: J. H. Jeans 
(4th edition). Camb. Univ. Press, 1920. 

The Electron Theory of Matter: O. W. Richardson. Camb. Univ. 



INDEX 



INDEX 



Aberration, 59 
Absorption of energy, S4 
Acceleration, 76, 78, 83 
Action at a distance, 57 
Addition of velocities, 19, 46 
Adjacent points, 105 
Aether, 62 

— -drift, 63, 63 
Arbitrary substitutions, xz6 
Astronomy, 8, lai 
Astronomical day, 13 
Axioms, 3, 149 

— truth of, 2 

Bachem, 158 
Basis of theory, 53 
" Being," 78, 128 
^rays, 59 
Biology, 149 

Cartesian system of co-ordi- 
nates, 7, 100, 147 
Cathode rays, 59 
Celestial mechanics, 125 
Centrifugal force, 94, 156 
Chest, 78 

Classical mechanics, 9, 13, z6, 
20, 36, 52, 84, X2I, 123, 
150 

— truth of, 15 

Clocks, II, 28, 95, 96, 112, X14, 
117-120, 121, 135, 155 

— rate of, 156 



Conception of mass, 54 

— position, 6 
Conservation of energy, 54, i2z 

— impulse, 121 
-^ mass, 54, 56 
Continuity, 113 
Continuum, 65, 98 
Continuum, two-dimensional, 

112 

— three-dimensional, 67 

— four-dimensional, 106, 108, 

109, 1X2, 147 

— space-time, 93, X08-X14 
— Euclidean, 99, lox, 104, no 

— non-Euclidean, 102, 107 
Co-ordinate differences, X09 

— differentials, X09 

— planes, 38 
Cottingham, 154 
Counter-point, 133 
Co-variant, 51 
Crommelin, 154 
Curvature of lis^t-rays, 124, 

152 

— Bpscty 153 

Curvilinear motion, 88 
Cyanogen bands, 158 

Darwinian theory, 149 
Davidson, 154 
Deductive thought, 148 
Derivation of laws, 52 



165 



166 



INDEX 



De Sitter, ax 

Di^dacement of spectral lines, 

124, IS5 
Distance Qine-interval), 3, St 

8, 34, 3Si 99, 104, 129 
-*- physical interpretation of, 5 

— relativity of, 34 
Doppler principle, 59 
Double stars, 21 

Eclipse of star, 21 
Eddington, 124, 154 
Electricity, 90 
Electrodynamics, 15, 24, 48, 

52,90 
Electromagnetic theory, $8 

— waves, 75 
Election, 52, 60 

— dectrical masses of, 60 
Electrostatics, 90 
Elliptical space, 133 
Empirical laws, 148 
Encounter (^)ace-time coin- 
cidence), 113 

Equivalent, 16 
Eudidean geometry, i, 2, 68, 
97, loi, 104, 128, 129, 

135, 147 
propositions of, 3, 8 

— space, 68, 102, 147 
Evoshed, 158 
Experience, 59, 70 

Faraday, 56, 74 
FitzGerald» 63 
Fixed stars, 12 
Fizeau, 46, 58, 6x 



Fizeau, experiment of, 46 
Frequency of atom, 157 

Gaiild, 12 

— transformation, 40, 43, 45, 

50,61 

Galileian system of co-ordi- 
nates, 13, IS, 17, 54, 93, 
108, 116, 119 

Gauss, X02, 103, 106 

Gaussian co-ordinates, 103- 
105, 112, 114-118 

General theory of relativity, 
69-124, IIS 

Geometrical ideas, 2, 3 

— propositions, i 

truth of, 2-4 

Gravitation, 75, 82, 92, 121 
Gravitational field, 7s, 79, 87, 

91, III, X16, 119, 120, 
136 
potential of, iS7 

— mass, 76, 81, 121 
Grebe, is8 
Group-density of stars, 126 

Hdmhqltz, 128 
Heuristic value of rdativity, 
50 

Induction, 148, 149 

Inertia, 77 

Inertial mass, 55, 76, 81, 120, 

121 
Instantaneous photograph 

(snapshot), 141 
Intensity of gravitational field, 

X27 



INDEX 



167 



Intuition, 148 
Ions, 53 

Kepler, 15a 

EJnetic energy, 53> x^x 

Lattice, 128 

Laws of Galilei-Newton, 15 
Law of inertia, za, 71, 72, 170 
Laws of Nature, 70, 84, 118 
Leverrier, 123, 152 
Light-signal, 40, 139, 143 
Light-stimulus, 40 
Limiting vdodty (c), 43, 44 
Lines of force, 126 
Lorentz, H. A., 24, 48, 52, 58, 

-— transformation, 39, 46, 50, 
108, 116, 139, 143, 144, 
146 

(generalised), 144 

Mach, K, 86 

Magnetic field, 74 

Manifold {see Continuum) 

Mass of heavenly bodies, 159 

Matter, 120 

Maxwdl, 49, 52, 5<^59» 61 

— fundamental equations, 56, 

Measurement of length, loz 
Measuring-rod, 5, 6, 34, 95, 
96, 1x2, 119, 121, 132, 

13S1 141 
Mercury, 123, 152 

— orbit of, 123, 15a 
liGchelson, 62-64 
Minkowski, 65-68, zoS, 147 



Moriey, 63, 64 
Motion, 16, 70 

— of heavenly bodies, 16, 17, 

$2, 122, 13s 

Newcomb, 152 

Newton, 12, 86, 122, 126, 150 
Ne?^n's constant of gravita- 
tion, 158 

— law of gravitation, 57, 94, 

127, 149 

— law of motion, 76 
Non-Eudidean geometry, 128 
Non-Galileian reference- 
bodies, 117 

Non-imiform motion, 72 

Optics, IS, 24, 52 
Organ-pipe, note of, 17 

Parabola, 9, 10 
Path-curve, 10 
Perihelion of Mercury, 150- 

152 
Physics, 8 

— of measurement, 7 
Place specification, 6 
Plane, i, 128, 129 
Poincar6, 128 
Point, z 

Point-mass, energy of, 54 

Position, 9 

Principle of relativity, 15-17, 

23, 24i 70 
Processes of Nature, 50 
Propagation of light, 2Z, 23, 

24, 36, 108, Z43 
in liquid, 47 

in gravitational fields, 88 



1«8 



INDEX 



Quasi-Eucfidean universe, 136 
Quasi-si^erical universe, 136 

Radiation, 55 
Radioactive substances, 59 
Reference-body, 5, 7, ^11, 

22, 28, 31, 32, 44, 70 
rotating, 94 

— mollusk, ii8~i2o 
Relative position, 3 

— velocity, 141 
Rest, 17 

Riemann, 102, 128, 133 
Rotation, 95, 147 

Schwarzschild, 158 
Seconds-dock, 44 
Seeliger, 125, 127 
Simultaneity, 26, 29-33, 96 

— relativity of, 31 
Size-relations, 107 
Solar eclipse, 89, 153, 155 
Space, 9, 62, 6s, 125 

— conception of, 24 

Space co-ordinates, 66, 96, 118 
Space-interval, 36, 67 

— point, 118 

Space, two-dimensional, 128 

— three-dimensional, 147 
Special theory of Relativity, 

1-68, 24 
Spherical surface, 129 

— space, 132, 133 
St. John, 159 
Stellar universe, 126 

— photographs, 153 



Stiai^t line, 1-3, 9, 10, 97, 

105, 129 
System of co-ordinates, 5, zo, 

II 

Terrestrial ^xice, 18 
Theory, 148 

— truth of, 149 
Three-dimensional, 65 
Time, conception €i, 24, 61, 

"5 

— co-ordinate, 66, 118 

— in Physics, 26, 117, 146 

— of an event, 28, 32 

interval, 36, 67 

Trajectory, 10 

" Truth," 2 

Uniform translation, 14, 69 
Universe (Woild),structure of, 
128, 13s 

— circumference of, 131 
UnivCTse, elliptical, 133, 136 

— Euclidean, 130, 132 

— space expanse (radius) of, 

137 

— ^herical, 132, 136 

Value of IT, 97, 130 
Velocity of lijg^t, 11, 21, 22, 

891 143 
Venus, 152 

Weight (heaviness), 77 
World, 65, 66, 130, 147 
World-point, 147 

— -radius, 133 
sphere, 130, 151 

Zeeman, 48 



WIDENER LIBRARY 

Harvaid CoOege, Cambridge, MA Q2138: (617) 495-2413 



If the Mem it recalled, the borniwer wfU be notified of 

the Med for an earlier return. (Non<«Mc^ of overdue 

notices does not cienqit the borrower ftfom overdne fines.) 





H ^ Sir.. 















Thmnkyamfw hdpb^ m topnaerve our coBedkmt 



